


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Japan Fund (PRJPX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Japan Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				PRJPX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/24/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$13.69
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.03
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/24/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								19.25%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$11.37
							
							-
							
								$13.69
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$590.72

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall





3 Year





5 Year





10 Year







				Morningstar rated the Japan Fund among 
37,
37,
28
and 
12
Japan Stock
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			This fund's objective is long-term growth of capital through investment in the common stocks of companies located, or with primary operations, in Japan.
		
Average Annual Total Returns 2



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					19.83%
				
			

				
					19.83%
				
			


3 Years

				
					10.19%
				
			

				
					10.19%
				
			


5 Years

				
					13.00%
				
			

				
					13.00%
				
			


10 Years

				
					3.05%
				
			

				
					3.05%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 2.68%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							2.68%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							December 30, 1991
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						1.02%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						1.02%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   								
			


				The Japan Fund charges a 2% 
redemption fee on shares held 90 days or less. 
The performance information shown does not reflect the deduction of the redemption fee; 
if it did, the performance would be lower.
			


2
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Mon Jul 24 23:05:32 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now





































Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















85% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 6/30/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Personal Finance





Summer 2017 Issue: T. Rowe Price Report

July 20, 2017









Personal Finance





Top 10 Financial To-Dos for Recent College Grads

July 19, 2017









Fixed Income





Finding Opportunities in High Yield Markets

July 18, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*157 of our 332 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 134 of these 157 (85%) funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 215 of 317 (68%), 183 of 225 (81%), 149 of 180 (83%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
36 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes). 34 of these 36 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 38 of 39, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 162 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 6/30/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari














404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                










Fund Finder




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in






(0)









Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          








											Mutual Funds
										



















  
  
  










0 Funds found





Filters








Quick sets















ASSET CLASS








Equity








Back








All Equity






Domestic Large





Domestic Small/Medium





Domestic All Cap





International Large





International Small/Medium





International All Cap








Fixed Income








Back








All Fixed Income






Short Duration/Government






Single Sector






Municipal/Tax-Free






Multi-Sector









Alternatives






Commodities






Real Estate / Infrastructure






Portfolio Solutions








Back








All Portfolio Solutions






Target Date









Money Markets








Back








All Money Markets






Taxable






Tax Free











SHARE CLASS








For all asset classes








Back









A





C





Institutional





Institutional Retirement





Retirement





Service







Admin





Separate Account





R6





Advisor





Preferred








For money market funds








Back









Institutional





Select





Preferred





Capital





Admin





Premier







Service





Resource





CMS





C





A





R6










MORNINGSTAR RATINGS










4 & 5 Stars






3, 4 & 5 Stars






All Rated








Morningstar Categories








Back








Morningstar Categories







Allocation--30pct to 50pct Equity





Allocation--85pct+ Equity





Bank Loan





Commodities Broad Basket





Corporate Bond





Diversified Emerging Mkts





Emerging Markets Bond





Emerging-Markets Local-Currency Bond





Energy Limited Partnership





Foreign Large Blend





Foreign Large Growth





Foreign Large Value





Foreign Small/Mid Value





Global Real Estate







High Yield Bond





High Yield Muni





Inflation-Protected Bond





Infrastructure





Intermediate Government





Intermediate-Term Bond





Large Blend





Large Growth





Large Value





Long-Short Credit





Long-Short Equity





Managed Futures





Mid-Cap Blend





Mid-Cap Growth







Mid-Cap Value





Multialternative





Muni National Interm





Muni National Short





Nontraditional Bond





Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stk





Real Estate





Short Government





Short-Term Bond





Small Blend





Small Growth





Small Value





Tactical Allocation





Target-Date 2020







Target-Date 2025





Target-Date 2030





Target-Date 2035





Target-Date 2040





Target-Date 2045





Target-Date 2050





Target-Date 2055





Technology





Ultrashort Bond





World Allocation





World Bond





World Large Stock











LIPPER RANKING










Top 25%






Top 50%






All Lipper








Lipper Categories








Back








Equity Categories











Emerging Markets Funds





Equity Income Funds





Global Multi-Cap Core





International Equity Income Funds





International Multi-Cap Core





International Small/Mid-Cap Core





Large-Cap Core Funds





Large-Cap Growth Funds





Large-Cap Value Funds





Mid-Cap Core Funds







Mid-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Core Funds





Multi-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Value Funds





Pacific Ex Japan Funds





Science & Technology Funds





Small-Cap Core Funds





Small-Cap Growth Funds





Small-Cap Value Funds










Fixed Income Categories











Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Core Bond Funds





Core Plus Bond Funds





Corporate Debt Funds BBB-Rated





Emerging Markets Local Currency Debt Fds





Emerging Mrkts Hard Currency Debt Funds





General U.S. Government Funds





Global Income Funds





High Yield Funds





High Yield Municipal Debt Funds







Inflation Protected Bond Funds





Intermediate Municipal Debt Funds





Intermediate U.S. Government Funds





Loan Participation Funds





Short Municipal Debt Funds





Short U.S. Government Funds





Short-Intmdt Investment Grade Debt Funds





U.S. Mortgage Funds





Ultra-Short Obligations Funds










Alternatives Categories











Absolute Return Funds





Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Alternative Long/Short Equity Funds







Alternative Managed Futures Funds





Alternative Multi-Strategy Funds





Flexible Portfolio Funds










Commodities Categories











Commodities General Funds


















Real Estate / Infrastructure











Energy MLP Funds





Global Infrastructure Funds





Global Real Estate Funds







International Real Estate Funds





Real Estate Funds










Portfolio Solutions Categories











Flexible Portfolio Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2020 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2025 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2030 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2035 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2040 Funds







Mixed-Asset Target 2045 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2050 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2055+ Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Agg Gro Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Growth Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Moderate Funds










Daily Liquid Alternatives Categories











Alternative Other Funds


























Quick sets








Featured Funds






Star Performers






Recently Viewed Funds













Reset




Save




DEFAULT SELECTIONS








Loading Fund Finder data...


No results match your criteria. Try broadening your search. Reset filters. Or go back to previous results.


Error loading page.  Please accept our apologies.




Performance
Prices
Characteristics
Fund Facts










New fund































                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Advisor Resources
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Defined Contribution Investment Only
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Regulatory Documents
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               



















































2017 Investment Outlook




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in










Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          

















2017 Investment Outlook


































The Long Cycle Continues





We expect the long post-crisis economic recovery to continue in 2017. As a base case, we think growth is poised to broaden out to more countries, with the global economy drawing on more sources of strength than at any point since 2010.
From an investment perspective, our base case view is broadly supportive for risk assets. We prefer equities over credit and credit over rates, but we expect low returns from these traditional exposures given 1) elevated valuations, 2) limited upside for corporate earnings from current levels and 3) limits to economic growth potential. Broadening exposure beyond conventional stocks and bonds, identifying opportunities in emerging markets and deploying more dynamic asset allocation strategies are some ways to adapt.
In some respects, our outlook represents an extension of the same long cycle we envisioned heading into 2016. The key difference for 2017 revolves around four emerging transitions. Populism is challenging globalism and creating new tail risks. Concerns about low growth are giving way to concerns about inflation. Years of focus on monetary policy are giving way to a close watch over fiscal policy. And concerns about new regulation are acceding to hopes for de-regulation.
Transition will be an evolving theme in 2017, and we will be re-visiting it in our publications throughout the year. In this Investment Outlook, we highlight specific signposts we will be watching, both to gauge the pace of transition and to test our base case view on the key investment questions.









Three Key Questions







Is it time to de-risk?
Is it time to de-risk?
No. We think de-risking would be premature, at
least from a purely return-generating standpoint. We
expect the macro environment to remain supportive
of risk assets during 2017 amid a slow-but-steady
expansion in developed markets and an acceleration
of growth in some emerging markets.

VIEW MORE



What’s driving the expansion?
What’s driving the expansion?
We believe this is a slow-growth recovery best
explained by cyclical economic drivers. We believe
the concerns about the developed world being mired
in a pattern of underinvestment and stalled growth—
so-called secular stagnation—are overdone.

VIEW MORE



Where do we see opportunities?
Where do we see opportunities?
In a low-return world, we look for sources of
return beyond conventional stock and bond market
approaches. We also think range-bound or volatile
markets create opportunities for more dynamic
investment strategies.

VIEW MORE






 
 






Transitions We’re Watching in 2017


















												Globalism to Populism
											



The biggest transition in the current environment is a shift away from globalism to a rising populist trend.















												Stagnation to Inflation
											



We expect concerns around potential secular stagnation to give way to a more inflationary paradigm in the US.















												Monetary to Fiscal Policy
											



The focus for stimulus is shifting toward fiscal spending, as central banks are stretching toward the limits of their easing ability.
















												Regulation to De-Regulation
											



We see the potential for greater regulatory divergence globally and the potential for competitive de-regulation.









2017 GDP Forecasts by Country, Region and Market (%)
We expect the prolonged expansion phase of the growth cycle to continue in 2017
 










Source: GSAM. As of January 2017.






Our 12-Month Cross-Asset Views Compared to 2016
We favor equities and emerging market assets over corporate credit and government bonds
 










Source: GSAM Global Portfolio Solutions (GPS) as of December 2016 and are subject to change. Chart reflects GPS relative asset allocation views and may not be representative of each GSAM portfolio team’s view on opportunities within individual markets.






Related Items











2017 INVESTMENT OUTLOOK
Download the full publication

 
													DOWNLOAD
												





2017 INVESTMENT OUTLOOK CHARTBOOK
Download the chartbook

 
													DOWNLOAD
												















                        
                        
                            Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Featured Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Perspectives
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               




SOLUTIONS FOR






                        
                        
                            About GSAM
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Overview
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News and Media
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Careers
		           		 
					     
						    



















































Fund Finder




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








						 Account Access








Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          








											Mutual Funds
										



















  
  
  










0 Funds found





Filters








Quick sets















ASSET CLASS








Equity








Back








All Equity






Domestic Large





Domestic Small/Medium





Domestic All Cap





International Large





International Small/Medium





International All Cap








Fixed Income








Back








All Fixed Income






Short Duration/Government






Single Sector






Municipal/Tax-Free






Multi-Sector









Alternatives






Commodities






Real Estate / Infrastructure






Portfolio Solutions








Back








All Portfolio Solutions






Target Date









Money Markets








Back








All Money Markets






Taxable






Tax Free











SHARE CLASS








For all asset classes








Back









A





C





Institutional





Institutional Retirement





Retirement





Service







Admin





Separate Account





R6





Advisor





Preferred








For money market funds








Back









Institutional





Select





Preferred





Capital





Admin





Premier







Service





Resource





CMS





C





A





R6










MORNINGSTAR RATINGS










4 & 5 Stars






3, 4 & 5 Stars






All Rated








Morningstar Categories








Back








Morningstar Categories







Allocation--30pct to 50pct Equity





Allocation--85pct+ Equity





Bank Loan





Commodities Broad Basket





Corporate Bond





Diversified Emerging Mkts





Emerging Markets Bond





Emerging-Markets Local-Currency Bond





Energy Limited Partnership





Foreign Large Blend





Foreign Large Growth





Foreign Large Value





Foreign Small/Mid Value





Global Real Estate







High Yield Bond





High Yield Muni





Inflation-Protected Bond





Infrastructure





Intermediate Government





Intermediate-Term Bond





Large Blend





Large Growth





Large Value





Long-Short Credit





Long-Short Equity





Managed Futures





Mid-Cap Blend





Mid-Cap Growth







Mid-Cap Value





Multialternative





Muni National Interm





Muni National Short





Nontraditional Bond





Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stk





Real Estate





Short Government





Short-Term Bond





Small Blend





Small Growth





Small Value





Tactical Allocation





Target-Date 2020







Target-Date 2025





Target-Date 2030





Target-Date 2035





Target-Date 2040





Target-Date 2045





Target-Date 2050





Target-Date 2055





Technology





Ultrashort Bond





World Allocation





World Bond





World Large Stock











LIPPER RANKING










Top 25%






Top 50%






All Lipper








Lipper Categories








Back








Equity Categories











Emerging Markets Funds





Equity Income Funds





Global Multi-Cap Core





International Equity Income Funds





International Multi-Cap Core





International Small/Mid-Cap Core





Large-Cap Core Funds





Large-Cap Growth Funds





Large-Cap Value Funds





Mid-Cap Core Funds







Mid-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Core Funds





Multi-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Value Funds





Pacific Ex Japan Funds





Science & Technology Funds





Small-Cap Core Funds





Small-Cap Growth Funds





Small-Cap Value Funds










Fixed Income Categories











Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Core Bond Funds





Core Plus Bond Funds





Corporate Debt Funds BBB-Rated





Emerging Markets Local Currency Debt Fds





Emerging Mrkts Hard Currency Debt Funds





General U.S. Government Funds





Global Income Funds





High Yield Funds





High Yield Municipal Debt Funds







Inflation Protected Bond Funds





Intermediate Municipal Debt Funds





Intermediate U.S. Government Funds





Loan Participation Funds





Short Municipal Debt Funds





Short U.S. Government Funds





Short-Intmdt Investment Grade Debt Funds





U.S. Mortgage Funds





Ultra-Short Obligations Funds










Alternatives Categories











Absolute Return Funds





Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Alternative Long/Short Equity Funds







Alternative Managed Futures Funds





Alternative Multi-Strategy Funds





Flexible Portfolio Funds










Commodities Categories











Commodities General Funds


















Real Estate / Infrastructure











Energy MLP Funds





Global Infrastructure Funds





Global Real Estate Funds







International Real Estate Funds





Real Estate Funds










Portfolio Solutions Categories











Flexible Portfolio Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2020 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2025 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2030 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2035 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2040 Funds







Mixed-Asset Target 2045 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2050 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2055+ Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Agg Gro Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Growth Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Moderate Funds










Daily Liquid Alternatives Categories











Alternative Other Funds


























Quick sets








Featured Funds






Star Performers






Recently Viewed Funds













Reset




Save




DEFAULT SELECTIONS








Loading Fund Finder data...


No results match your criteria. Try broadening your search. Reset filters. Or go back to previous results.


Error loading page.  Please accept our apologies.




Performance
Prices
Characteristics
Fund Facts










New fund































                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Products
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Prospectuses
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               



















































Fund Finder




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in






(0)









Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          








											Mutual Funds
										



















  
  
  










0 Funds found





Filters








Quick sets















ASSET CLASS








Equity








Back








All Equity






Domestic Large





Domestic Small/Medium





Domestic All Cap





International Large





International Small/Medium





International All Cap








Fixed Income








Back








All Fixed Income






Short Duration/Government






Single Sector






Municipal/Tax-Free






Multi-Sector









Alternatives






Commodities






Real Estate / Infrastructure






Portfolio Solutions








Back








All Portfolio Solutions






Target Date









Money Markets








Back








All Money Markets






Taxable






Tax Free











SHARE CLASS








For all asset classes








Back









A





C





Institutional





Institutional Retirement





Retirement





Service







Admin





Separate Account





R6





Advisor





Preferred








For money market funds








Back









Institutional





Select





Preferred





Capital





Admin





Premier







Service





Resource





CMS





C





A





R6










MORNINGSTAR RATINGS










4 & 5 Stars






3, 4 & 5 Stars






All Rated








Morningstar Categories








Back








Morningstar Categories







Allocation--30pct to 50pct Equity





Allocation--85pct+ Equity





Bank Loan





Commodities Broad Basket





Corporate Bond





Diversified Emerging Mkts





Emerging Markets Bond





Emerging-Markets Local-Currency Bond





Energy Limited Partnership





Foreign Large Blend





Foreign Large Growth





Foreign Large Value





Foreign Small/Mid Value





Global Real Estate







High Yield Bond





High Yield Muni





Inflation-Protected Bond





Infrastructure





Intermediate Government





Intermediate-Term Bond





Large Blend





Large Growth





Large Value





Long-Short Credit





Long-Short Equity





Managed Futures





Mid-Cap Blend





Mid-Cap Growth







Mid-Cap Value





Multialternative





Muni National Interm





Muni National Short





Nontraditional Bond





Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stk





Real Estate





Short Government





Short-Term Bond





Small Blend





Small Growth





Small Value





Tactical Allocation





Target-Date 2020







Target-Date 2025





Target-Date 2030





Target-Date 2035





Target-Date 2040





Target-Date 2045





Target-Date 2050





Target-Date 2055





Technology





Ultrashort Bond





World Allocation





World Bond





World Large Stock











LIPPER RANKING










Top 25%






Top 50%






All Lipper








Lipper Categories








Back








Equity Categories











Emerging Markets Funds





Equity Income Funds





Global Multi-Cap Core





International Equity Income Funds





International Multi-Cap Core





International Small/Mid-Cap Core





Large-Cap Core Funds





Large-Cap Growth Funds





Large-Cap Value Funds





Mid-Cap Core Funds







Mid-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Core Funds





Multi-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Value Funds





Pacific Ex Japan Funds





Science & Technology Funds





Small-Cap Core Funds





Small-Cap Growth Funds





Small-Cap Value Funds










Fixed Income Categories











Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Core Bond Funds





Core Plus Bond Funds





Corporate Debt Funds BBB-Rated





Emerging Markets Local Currency Debt Fds





Emerging Mrkts Hard Currency Debt Funds





General U.S. Government Funds





Global Income Funds





High Yield Funds





High Yield Municipal Debt Funds







Inflation Protected Bond Funds





Intermediate Municipal Debt Funds





Intermediate U.S. Government Funds





Loan Participation Funds





Short Municipal Debt Funds





Short U.S. Government Funds





Short-Intmdt Investment Grade Debt Funds





U.S. Mortgage Funds





Ultra-Short Obligations Funds










Alternatives Categories











Absolute Return Funds





Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Alternative Long/Short Equity Funds







Alternative Managed Futures Funds





Alternative Multi-Strategy Funds





Flexible Portfolio Funds










Commodities Categories











Commodities General Funds


















Real Estate / Infrastructure











Energy MLP Funds





Global Infrastructure Funds





Global Real Estate Funds







International Real Estate Funds





Real Estate Funds










Portfolio Solutions Categories











Flexible Portfolio Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2020 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2025 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2030 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2035 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2040 Funds







Mixed-Asset Target 2045 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2050 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2055+ Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Agg Gro Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Growth Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Moderate Funds










Daily Liquid Alternatives Categories











Alternative Other Funds


























Quick sets








Featured Funds






Star Performers






Recently Viewed Funds













Reset




Save




DEFAULT SELECTIONS








Loading Fund Finder data...


No results match your criteria. Try broadening your search. Reset filters. Or go back to previous results.


Error loading page.  Please accept our apologies.




Performance
Prices
Characteristics
Fund Facts










New fund































                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Advisor Resources
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Defined Contribution Investment Only
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Regulatory Documents
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               



















































Goldman Sachs Active Beta ETFs



















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in






(0)









Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          

















 

 


Goldman Sachs ETFs



































ACTIVEBETA®
1 of 4





ACCESS BONDS
2 of 4





HEDGE INDUSTRY
3 of 4





TREASURY ACCESS
4 of 4













Next Generation of ETF Investing

                Over the last two decades, investors have increasingly turned to Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs) seeking to benefit from a defined strategy, diversified exposure to stocks, tax efficiency and low costs. Today, we combine the potential benefits of ETFs with the advanced strategies of Goldman Sachs Asset Managment (GSAM).
            









What Are the Potential Benefits of ETFs?





ETFs have grown in popularity due to the many benefits they offer: intraday trading ease, relative transparency and a likelihood of tax efficiency—all typically at lower total cost than most actively managed mutual funds.
 











The Four Ts









 
Source: GSAM. For illustrative purposes only.
We note that ETFs are not riskless investments, so investors can lose money. Please see the ETF Risk Disclosures for additional risk considerations in the end disclosures. Ordinary brokerage commissions apply. Brokerage commissions will reduce returns.
Goldman Sachs does not provide legal, tax or accounting advice to its clients. All investors are strongly urged to consult with their legal, tax, or accounting advisors regarding any potential transactions or investments. There is no assurance that the tax status or treatment of a proposed transaction or investment will continue in the future. Tax treatment or status may be changed by law or government action in the future or on a retroactive basis.










Exponential Growth of the ETF Market





Developed in the early 1990s with lower cost, transparency and tax efficiency in mind, today there are ETFs representing both broad and narrow sectors of the market, and hundreds of ways to diversify. With $2 trillion in investor assets, it’s safe to say that ETFs are here to stay.
 







 








Growth of ETFs










 







EXPLORE ETF PRODUCTS 






Next Generation of Equity Index Investing

                GSAM has developed a series of ETFs built on smart beta1 principles—a transparent, rules-based strategy that goes beyond stocks’ market capitalization, resulting in a more economically intuitive way to invest.
            

















 

$ {headerPrefix } 







Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta™ ETFs















Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta™ ETFs

 / 






















Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta™ ETFs





These ETFs are designed to track an ActiveBeta® Index, a proprietary performance-seeking methodology from Goldman Sachs, which tilts towards stocks based on four well-established drivers of performance, often referred to as factors.








The Four Factors














The Advantages of Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta™ Investing









Opportunity to Outperform the Market




To construct the ActiveBeta® Index, GSAM employs a simple, transparent process that helps identify and emphasize stocks within the market-cap weighted universe, potentially providing greater returns.
 









A Diversified Approach




Individual factors can be cyclical in the short run, which may lead to timing and performance challenges. Combining four complementary smart beta factors equally can potentially result in a more consistent investment experience over time.
 









Lower Cost




Not only are ActiveBeta™ ETFs a fraction of the price of most smart beta ETFs, they are also among the most competitively priced products on the market.2











Source: Morningstar and GSAM as of May 16, 2016. For illustrative purposes only.
There is no guarantee that these objectives will be met. ActiveBeta® is a trademark of Goldman Sachs. 9.0 bps (after expense limitation) for ActiveBeta® U.S. Large Cap Equity ETF refers to the Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta® U.S. Large Cap Equity ETF. 9.5 bps for largest ETF by Assets under Management (AUM) refers to the SPDR S&P 500 ETF Trust (SPY). ALPS Distributors, Inc. is the distributor for the SPDR S&P 500 ETF Trust (SPY). 35.3 bps refers to the average fund fee for Strategic Beta ETFs in the Morningstar US ETF Large Blend Category and 32.2 bps refers to the average fund fee of index ETFs in the Morningstar US ETF Large Blend Category.








ActiveBeta™ ETFs Brochure
Download the brochure

 
													DOWNLOAD
												










Next Generation Fixed Income Investing

                GSAM now offers the next generation, smart beta Access ETFs that seek better risk-adjusted returns to help meet the needs of today’s fixed income investor.
            









Access ETFs by Goldman Sachs





GSAM’s Access ETFs can help investors build efficient fixed income portfolios. Going a step further than traditional market-value weighted methodology, a smart beta approach selects bonds based on liquidity and customized fundamentals.














The Advantages of Goldman Sachs Fixed Income Investing









Smarter Access to Bond Markets




The index employs a simple, transparent process that helps identify an investible universe, then eliminates issuers with relative deteriorating fundamentals to offer exposure to existing sector or market beta.
 









Seeks Smoother Performance, Less Volatility




As bond investors look for income and diversification, a smart beta approach seeks liquidity while minimizing exposure to factors historically associated with volatility and underperformance.
 









Lower Cost




Access ETFs are among the most competitively priced ETFs on the market. They also offer transparency and can alleviate some of the challenges of buying bonds in the over-the-counter market.3










Source: GSAM and Morningstar. Data as of March 31, 2017. For illustrative purposes only. The GS Access Investment Grade Corporate Bond ETF expense ratio is 14 basis points (bp). Please see the end notes for expense ratio and other important disclosures. Category expense ratios represent category averages for all funds in the corporate bond category as defined by Morningstar. The average net expense ratio for ETFs in the category is 19 bps and for active and passive mutual funds combined, I-Shares only, it is 57 bps.








Access ETFs Brochure
Download the brochure

 
													DOWNLOAD
												









Access to Top Insights

                GSAM developed the Goldman Sachs Hedge Fund VIP Index, which tracks insights from some of the leading thinkers in the hedge fund universe. The Goldman Sachs Hedge Industry VIP ETF seeks to track this index and provides exposure to hedge fund managers’ most important long equity ideas.
            









Introducing the Goldman Sachs Hedge Industry VIP ETF (Ticker: GVIP)





The fund seeks to track the Goldman Sachs Hedge Fund VIP Index, which is constructed in accordance with a rules-based methodology derived from concepts previously developed by Goldman Sachs’ Global Investment Research division. The Index is designed to measure the performance of fundamentally-driven hedge fund managers' “Very-Important-Positions” — those positions that appear most frequently among their top 10 long equity holdings. The Goldman Sachs Hedge Industry VIP ETF (Ticker: GVIP) seeks to deliver these high-conviction ideas through the ease, transparency and liquidity of an ETF.









The Advantages of Investing in GVIP














The Fund is not a hedge fund and does not invest in hedge funds.
1. ETFs offer many benefits, including intraday trading, relative transparency and tax efficiency potential, all at typically lower expense ratios than most actively-managed mutual funds.








Hedge Industry VIP ETF Brochure
Download the brochure

 
													DOWNLOAD
												









Access to the Treasury Market

                GSAM developed an ETF that provides access to Treasuries with a maturity of less than a year, which are backed by the full faith and credit of the US Government. Investors in the Goldman Sachs TreasuryAccess 0-1 Year ETF can gain easy access to Treasury markets while avoiding the operational and pricing complexities of US Treasury Auctions and over-the-counter market.
            









Introducing the Goldman Sachs TreasuryAccess 0-1 Year ETF (Ticker: GBIL)





The fund seeks to track the Citi US Treasury 0–1 Year Composite Select Index, which is designed to measure the performance of U.S. Treasury Obligations4 with a maximum remaining maturity of one year. The Goldman Sachs TreasuryAccess 0–1 Year ETF (Ticker: GBIL) provides access to the Treasury market through a lower cost, convenient and transparent ETF. The fund benefits from the experience of the GSAM Liquidity Solutions team, providing trade execution, price negotiation and security selection in the short-term Treasury market.









The Advantages of Investing in GBIL










Any guarantee on U.S Treasury Obligations applies only to the underlying securities of the Fund if held to maturity and not to the value of the Fund’s shares.
Individual shares may only be purchased and sold in secondary market transactions through brokers; shares trade at market prices rather than NAV; shares may trade at a price greater than or less than NAV; and investors may incur commission costs when buying or selling shares.
The Fund is not a money market fund and does not attempt to maintain a stable net asset value.








TreasuryAccess ETF Brochure
Download the brochure

 
													DOWNLOAD
												









Goldman Sachs Exchange-Traded Funds

	       At Goldman Sachs Asset Management, we have a history of investment innovation—grounded in our commitment to provide clients with solutions that keep up with changing times. Our skilled investment teams manage a variety of advanced strategies** that capitalize on our global reach and deep knowledge of the markets. By offering these advanced strategies as Goldman Sachs ETFs, we continue this legacy and lead the way for the next generation of ETF investing.
	    

EXPLORE ETF PRODUCTS 












                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Advisor Resources
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Defined Contribution Investment Only
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Regulatory Documents
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               






















































aberdeen japan equity fund - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










Japanese Equity Fund - Japanese Equity Fund | about.com



Ad
 ·
www.about.com/​equity fund



Find Japanese Equity Fund and Related Articles. Search Now!





Search About.com



About.com Story



1000 Expert Writers




About.com Home



100+ Topics



Trusted Guides





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund - LookSmart | www1.looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund



Results for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund. Get the look smart on Looksmart.com





Look Here



More Info



Good Results





Aberdeen Equity - Search for Aberdeen Equity.



Ad
 ·
CanDoFinance.com/​Aberdeen Equity



Search for Aberdeen Equity. Related Articles on CanDoFinance.




Fund Equity - Search for Fund Equity.



Ad
 ·
excite.com/​Fund Equity



Search for Fund Equity. Find Fund Equity.




Searches related toaberdeen japan equity fund



aberdeen us equity fund


jeq



japan closed end funds


aberdeen global




Web Results

Japan Equity Fund, Inc. | Aberdeen US

www.aberdeenjeq.com


$$US Investment Trusts|Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc.|InvestmentObjective$$ Investment Policies The Fund seeks to achieve its investment objective by investing ...


Aberdeen Japan Equity | Aberdeen Fund Managers Limited ...

https://www.trustnet.com/Factsheets/Factsheet.aspx?fundCode=MJJG


Aberdeen Japan Equity from Aberdeen Fund Managers Limited prices, cumulative, discrete & annual performances. Investment objectives, asset allocation, top ten ...


JEQ Stock Price - Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. Stock ...

www.marketwatch.com/investing/stock/JEQ


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. stock price, stock quotes and financial overviews from MarketWatch.


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance ...

www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/aberdeen-japan-equity-fund-inc...


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance ...

https://finance.yahoo.com/news/aberdeen-japan-equity-fund-inc...


PHILADELPHIA , July 24, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. (the "Fund") (NYSE: JEQ) , a closed-end equity fund, announced today its performance ...


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund - Aberdeen Asset Management

www.aberdeen-asia.com/.../funds-and-prices/aberdeen-japan-equity-fund


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Investment Objective. The Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund aims to provide Holders with medium to long-term capital growth from a portfolio of ...


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund A|GB0004521620

www.morningstar.co.uk/uk/funds/snapshot/snapshot.aspx?id=F0GBR04DTK


Fund price for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund A along with Morningstar ratings & research, long term fund performance and charts


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc - Bloomberg.com

https://www.bloomberg.com/quote/JEQ:US


Performance charts for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc (JEQ) including intraday, historical and comparison charts, technical analysis and trend lines.


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Results Of ...

https://ih.advfn.com/p.php?pid=nmona&article=75087792


JEQ Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Results Of Annual Meeting Of Stockholders


JEQ : Summary for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc - Yahoo

https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/JEQ


View the basic JEQ stock chart on Yahoo Finance. Change the date range, chart type and compare Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc against other companies.










Japanese Equity Fund - Japanese Equity Fund | about.com



Ad
 ·
www.about.com/​equity fund



Find Japanese Equity Fund and Related Articles. Search Now!





Search About.com



About.com Story



1000 Expert Writers




About.com Home



100+ Topics



Trusted Guides





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund - LookSmart | www1.looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund



Results for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund. Get the look smart on Looksmart.com





Look Here



More Info



Good Results





Aberdeen Equity - Search for Aberdeen Equity.



Ad
 ·
CanDoFinance.com/​Aberdeen Equity



Search for Aberdeen Equity. Related Articles on CanDoFinance.




Fund Equity - Search for Fund Equity.



Ad
 ·
excite.com/​Fund Equity



Search for Fund Equity. Find Fund Equity.



Searches related toaberdeen japan equity fund



aberdeen us equity fund


jeq



japan closed end funds


aberdeen global




12345Next






Answers







Companies listed on the New York Stock...



US Abercrombie & Fitch US Aberdeen Greater China Fund, Inc. US Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. US Aberdeen Singapore Fund,

more






Equity Funding



Equity Funding Corporation of America was a Los Angeles-based U.S. financial conglomerate that marketed a package of mutual funds and life insurance to...

more






Private equity fund



A private equity fund is a collective investment scheme used for making investments in various equity (and to a lesser extent debt) securities...

more




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network
















 JEQ: Quote and summary for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund - MSN Money















msn  back to msn home

money










web search














Sign in








Change language & content:

América Latina (español)
Argentina (español)
Australia (English)
België (Nederlands)
Belgique (français)
Brasil (português)
Canada (English)
Canada (français)
Chile (español)
Colombia (español)
Danmark (Dansk)
Deutschland (Deutsch)
España (español)
France (français)
India (English)
Indonesia (Bahasa Indonesia)
Ireland (English)
Italia (italiano)
Malaysia (English)
México (español)
Nederland (Nederlands)
New Zealand (English)
Norge (norsk, bokmål)
Österreich (Deutsch)
Perú (español)
Philippines (English)
Polska (polski)
Portugal (Português)
Schweiz (Deutsch)
Singapore (English)
South Africa (English)
Suisse (français)
Suomi (suomi)
Sverige (svenska)
Türkiye (Türkçe)
United Arab Emirates (English)
United Kingdom (English)
United States (English)
United States (español)
Venezuela (español)
Việt Nam (Tiếng Việt)
Ελλάδα (ελληνικά)
Россия (Pусский)
ישראל (עברית)‏
الإمارات العربية المتحدة (العربية‏)
المملكة العربية السعودية (العربية‏)
مصر (العربية‏)
ไทย (ไทย)
한국 (한국어)
中华人民共和国 (简体中文)
台灣 (繁體中文)
日本 (日本語)
香港特别行政區 (繁體中文)



Switch to Latino (Español)



 Feedback



Help






























AdChoices














Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund
NYSE: JEQ



US Markets Open In51 min










AdChoices








8.58


▼


-0.01
-0.12%



 : 






 July 24, 2017 4:08 PM EDT. Delayed 15 minutes. Currency In USD                
















Save














 Summary




 Analysis



















































Open
8.56


Previous Close
8.59


Vol (3-Month Avg.)
12.43k


Day's Range
8.55-8.58


52 week range
7.31-8.70


Net Assets
129.50M


Yield
0.91%


Category
Japan Stock  


Morningstar Risk
-







Profile






Name of Issuer


Aberdeen




Expenses


0.92%







To outperform over the long term, on a total return basis (including appreciation and dividends), the sectors of the Tokyo Stock Price Index ("TOPIX"), a composite market-capitalization weighted index of all common stocks listed on the First or Second Section of the Tokyo Stock Exchange ("TSE") or listed on the over-the-counter market in Japan or listed on other stock exchanges in Japan.





aberdeen-asset.com





Inception
7/24/1992














Recent News







Closed-End Funds:Closing Table

                            
                            The Wall Street Journal
                        
5 days ago






Closed-End Funds:Closing Table

                            
                            The Wall Street Journal
                        
7/14/2017






Closed-End Funds:Closing Table

                            
                            The Wall Street Journal
                        
7/13/2017






Closed-End Funds:Closing Table

                            
                            The Wall Street Journal
                        
7/11/2017






Closed-End Funds:Closing Table

                            
                            The Wall Street Journal
                        
7/7/2017






Closed-End Funds:Closing Table

                            
                            The Wall Street Journal
                        
6/30/2017








Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

                            
                            The Business Journal
                        
1 day ago






Armada Hoffler Tower

                            
                            revolvy.com
                        
6 days ago






Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc.

                            
                            buzzfile.com
                        
7/18/2017






Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund A

                            
                            markets.ft.com
                        
7/18/2017






Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc (NYSE:JEQ) Sees Significantly Lower Trading Volume

                            
                            fidaily.com
                        
7/17/2017






Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund I Acc

                            
                            www.fidelity.co.uk
                        
7/17/2017








Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc

                            
                            markets.ft.com
                        
7/13/2017






View Shortable Stocks

                            
                            www.interactivebrokers.com
                        
7/8/2017






Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund I Acc

                            
                            www.fidelity.co.uk
                        
7/7/2017






View Shortable Stocks

                            
                            www.interactivebrokers.com
                        
6/30/2017






Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund I

                            
                            Morningstar
                        
6/30/2017






Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund A

                            
                            Morningstar
                        
6/30/2017
























AdChoices

















AdChoices




















Markets











DOW

DOW



▼

21,513.17


-66.90
-0.31%













Last updated time
7/25/2017 8:38 AM EDT







Markets





NASDAQ

NASDAQ



▲

6,410.81




+23.05
+0.36%










FTSE 100

FTSE 100



▲

7,432.82




+55.09
+0.75%










NYSE Composite

NYSE Composite



▼

11,904.71




-19.89
-0.17%



















AdChoices
















                Feedback
            







Send Feedback
Provide Feedback
Report a Problem


We appreciate your input!



Select a category:

I'm having problems with Top Destinations
I'm having issues searching
I'm having problems with Featured Apps
I see an error in the content
Other



How we can improve?





Please give an overall site rating:









Submit
Close


Privacy Statement


Help


Help & Support



 











 






Japan Equity Fund, Inc. | Aberdeen US




















        In order to bring you the best possible user experience, this site uses Javascript. If you are seeing this message, it is likely that the Javascript option in your browser is disabled. For optimal viewing of this site, please ensure that Javascript is enabled for your browser.















Don't show this message againWe use cookies to help improve your online experience. By using this site, you agree that we may store and access cookies on your device. You can change your cookie settings at any time.




Skip to main content


















Search our site





























 










		                                    Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. (NYSE: JEQ)
A concentrated portfolio of Japanese stocks researched first-hand 
by our dedicated team of professionals located in Tokyo.





















								Investment Objective




The Fund’s investment objective is to outperform over the long term, on a total return basis (including appreciation and dividends), the Tokyo Stock Price Index (TOPIX).
Investment Policies
The Fund seeks to achieve its investment objective by investing substantially all of its assets, but under normal circumstances at least 80% of its assets, in equity securities of companies listed on the Tokyo Stock Exchange or listed on the over-the-counter market in Japan or listed on other stock exchanges in Japan.
The information contained above provides only a brief summary description of the Fund's investment objective and investment policies.
For more detailed information on the specific risks associated with this Fund, please view the Fund’s Important Risk Considerations.

Factsheet
Commentary

Risk Considerations
International investing entails special risk considerations, including currency ﬂuctuations, lower liquidity, economic and political risks, and differences in accounting methods; these risks are generally heightened for emerging market investments.
There are also risks associated with investing in Japan, including the risk of investing in a single-country fund. Concentrating investments in the Japan region subjects the Fund to more volatility and greater risk of loss than geographically diverse funds.
Equity stocks of small and mid-cap companies carry greater risk, and more volatility than equity stocks of larger, more established companies.











Daily Data
 At close 25-07-2017
Common Stock

NAV $: 9.68

Market Price $: 8.57

Premium+/Discount- %: -11.47

Unadjusted NAV** $: 9.68

The NAV information is provided by the Fund's accounting agent. The price is as reported by the exchange on which the Fund trades. This information is unaudited and neither Aberdeen Asset Management PLC, its wholly owned subsidiaries, the Funds, nor any other person guarantees their accuracy.















			Education center




The following information is intended to provide investors with a better understanding of the distinct features of closed-end funds.
Education center








			Fund announcements and press releases




Announcements of record date, performance data and other fund announcements.
AnnouncementsSection 19 notices








			Closed-End Fund TV




Watch live and recorded webcasts and videos featuring Aberdeen portfolio managers and industry experts.
Closed-End Fund TV








			Our closed-end funds




Aberdeen’s investment teams manage closed-end funds covering a range of investment strategies and markets.
Closed-end fund range




























Welcome
to Aberdeen
Please select your region:


Asia & Australia
Europe
Americas
Africa
Middle East





Australia and New Zealand
Malaysia
Singapore
China/ 中国
台灣 (Taiwan)
Hong Kong / 香港
Thailand / ประเทศไทย 
日本 (Japan)
Indonesia
Korea / 대한민국





Belgium NL / FR
Malta
Czech Republic
Danmark / EN
Nederland / EN
Deutschland
Norge / EN
España
Österreich
France
Schweiz / EN / FR
Ireland
Suomi / EN
Italia 
Sverige / EN
Jersey
United Kingdom
Luxembourg
Private Wealth Management
Magyarország






Canada /FR
United States
Brasil /EN
International Wealth Management – Americas





South Africa





Middle East




Visit our Australia Homepage

Remember me




Visit our China Homepage

Remember me




Visit our 中国 Homepage

Remember me




Visit our Hong Kong Homepage

Remember me




Visit our 香港 Homepage

Remember me




Visit our 日本 Homepage

Remember me





Institutional Investors
Retail Investors

Or
Visit our Malaysia Homepage

Remember me




Visit our Singapore Homepage

Remember me




Visit our 新加坡 Homepage

Remember me




Visit our 台灣 Homepage

Remember me




Visit our Thailand Homepage

Remember me




Visit our ประเทศไทย Homepage

Remember me




Visit our Indonesia Homepage

Remember me




Visit our Korea Homepage

Remember me




한국 웹사이트를 방문하여 주십시오

Remember me





Professionele en institutionele beleggers
Particuliere beleggers


Bezoek onze Belgische homepage

Remember me





Investisseurs professionnels et institutionnels
Investisseurs particuliers


Consultez notre page d’accueil pour la Belgique

Remember me





Aberdeens ejendomme
Aberdeen udlejning
Professionelle investorer


Or
Visit our Danmark Homepage

Remember me





Aberdeen Property
Aberdeen Letting site



Remember me





Institutionelle Investoren
Privatanleger


Or
Visit our deutschland Homepage

Remember me





Inversores particulares
Inversores profesionales


Or
Visit our España Homepage

Remember me





Investisseurs particuliers
Investisseurs professionnels et institutionnels


Or
Visit our France Homepage

Remember me





Visit our Ireland Homepage

Remember me





Investitori Privati
Investitori Professionali


Or
Visita la home Italia

 Ricordami





Private Wealth Management
Aberdeen Asian Income Fund
Aberdeen Latin American Income Fund


Or
Visit our Jersey Homepage

Remember me





Individual Investors
Professional Investors


Or
Visit our Luxembourg Homepage

Remember me





Visit our Magyarország Homepage

Remember me





Visit our Malta Homepage

Remember me




Navštivte naši českou stránku

Remember me





Professionele Beleggers
Individuele beleggers
Vastgoed


Or
Visit our Nederland Homepage

Remember me





Professional Investors


Or
Visit our Netherlands Homepage

Remember me





Aberdeen eiendomsforvaltning/utleie
Profesjonelle investorer
Private investorer


Or
 Besøk vår norske hjemmeside

Husk meg





Aberdeen Property
Professional Investors
Private Investors


Or
Visit our Norway Homepage

Remember me





Privatanleger
Institutionelle Investoren


Or
Visit our Österreich Homepage

Remember me





Privatanleger
Institutionelle Investoren


Or
Visit our Schweiz Homepage

Remember me





Investisseurs professionnels
Les investisseurs particuliers


Or
Visit our Suisse Homepage

Remember me





Professional Investors
Individual Investors


Or
Visit our Switzerland Homepage

Remember me





Yksityissijoittajat
Ammattimaiset sijoittajat


Or
Tutustu suomalaisiin kotisivuihimme

 Muista minut





Private Investors
Professional Investors


Or
Visit our Finland Homepage

Remember me





Privata investerare


Or
Svenska startsidan

Remember me





Private Investors
Professional Investors


Or
Visit our Sweden Homepage

Remember me





Private Investors
Investment Trust Investors
Financial Adviser
Discretionary Asset Manager
Family Office
Institutional Investors
Charities
Consultants
Insurance
Pensions
Treasury Management


Or
Visit our United Kingdom Homepage

Remember me





Visit our Private Wealth Management Homepage

Remember me





Institutional Investors
Individual Investors


Or
Visit our Canada Homepage

Remember me





Placements institutionnels
Services aux particuliers


Or
Visit our Canada FR Homepage

Remember me





Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Institutional Investors


Or
Visit our American Homepage

Remember me





Visite nosso site brasileiro


Remember me





Visit our Brazil Homepage


Remember me





Visit our International Wealth Management – Americas


Remember me





Visit our South Africa Homepage


Remember me





Visit our Middle East Homepage


Remember me






 Go to Global Home 



Close

 
 


































 



 Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition 
         










    










 













 











 



















Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
        																																												
              
















 News provided by
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc.  
Jul 24, 2017, 16:05 ET









 Share this article




























































PHILADELPHIA, July 24, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. (the "Fund") (NYSE:   JEQ), a closed-end equity fund, announced today its performance data and portfolio composition as of June 30, 2017.  
The Fund's total returns for various periods through June 30, 2017 are provided below. (All figures are based on distributions reinvested at the dividend reinvestment price and are stated net-of-fees):













 Cumulative as of 06/30/17 
 Annualized as of 06/30/17 



 1 Month 
 3 Month 
 YTD 
 1 Year 
 3 Years 
 5 Years 
 10 Years 
 Since Inception 


 NAV  
 0.2 
 5.9 
 12.9 
 11.4 
 9.2 
 13.0 
 2.4 
 2.1 


 Market Price 
 0.4 
 6.9 
 15.2 
 15.4 
 9.5 
 13.2 
 1.7 
 1.6 


 TOPIX 
 1.3 
 5.9 
 11.5 
 20.7 
 7.0 
 10.5 
 2.0 
 3.1 




On June 30, 2017, the Fund's net assets amounted to US$127.6 million and the Fund's NAV per share was US$9.54.
As of June 30, 2017, the portfolio was invested as follows:




 Portfolio Composition 
 Percent of Net Assets 


 Consumer Staples 
 20.1 


 Industrials 
 19.6 


 Consumer Discretionary 
 12.3 


 Information Technology 
 10.0 


 Health Care 
 9.8 


 Materials 
 9.4 


 Financials 
 8.4 


 Real Estate 
 5.6 


 Telecommunications 
 3.8 


 Cash 
 1.1 




The Fund's ten largest equity holdings as of June 30, 2017, representing 41.6% of net assets, were: 




 Stock  
 Percent of Net Assets 


 Shin-Etsu Chemical 
 5.7 


 Japan Tobacco 
 4.9 


 Keyence Corp. 
 4.8 


 Seven & I Holdings 
 4.3 


 Amada Holdings 
 3.9 


 KDDI Corp. 
 3.8 


 Nabtesco Corp. 
 3.7 


 Fanuc 
 3.7 


 Yahoo Japan 
 3.4 


 Pigeon Corp. 
 3.2 




Important InformationAberdeen Asset Management Inc. has prepared this report based on information sources believed to be accurate and reliable. All reasonable care has been taken to ensure accuracy. However, the figures are unaudited and neither the Fund, Aberdeen Asset Management Asia Limited (the Investment Manager), nor any other person guarantees their accuracy. Investors should seek their own professional advice and should consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses before acting on this information. 
Aberdeen Asset Management Asia Limited (the "Investment Manager") and Aberdeen Asset Management Inc. (the "Administrator") are each a subsidiary of Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ("Aberdeen PLC").  On March 6, 2017, the Boards of Standard Life plc and Aberdeen PLC announced that they had reached an agreement on the terms of a merger ("Merger"). The Boards of each of Standard Life plc and Aberdeen PLC believe that the Merger has a compelling strategic and financial rationale through combining complementary strengths to create a world-class investment group. The Merger is expected to occur in the third quarter of 2017, subject to various conditions and terms, including regulatory approvals. The portfolio management team for the Fund is not expected to change as a result of the Merger.  In addition, the agreements that the Fund has with Aberdeen PLC's subsidiary companies, the services provided by such companies, and the fees charged for those services are not expected to change as a result of the Merger.
Closed-end funds are traded on the secondary market through one of the stock exchanges. The Fund's investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that an investor's shares may be worth more or less than the original cost. Shares of closed-end funds may trade above (a premium) or below (a discount) the net asset value (NAV) of the fund's portfolio. There is no assurance that the Fund will achieve its investment objective. 
Total return figures with distributions reinvested at the dividend reinvestment price are stated net-of-fees and represents past performance.  Past performance is not indicative of future results, current performance may be higher or lower.  Holdings are subject to change and are provided for informational purposes only and should not be deemed as a recommendation to buy or sell the securities shown.  Inception date July 24, 1992. 
If you wish to receive this information electronically, please contact: InvestorRelations@aberdeen-asset.com
View original content with multimedia:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/aberdeen-japan-equity-fund-inc-announces-performance-data-and-portfolio-composition-300492548.html
SOURCE Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc.
 Related Links

http://www.aberdeenjeq.com



 


















Jun 22, 2017, 16:30 ET
Preview: Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.






 Also from this source




 











Jun 22, 2017, 16:30 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And...








 











May 22, 2017, 16:30 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And...





 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Mutual Funds








 You just read:
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


 News provided by
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc.  
Jul 24, 2017, 16:05 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 










































Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition - The Business Journals



































Menu









Select a City



National


Albany


Albuquerque


Atlanta


Austin


Baltimore


Birmingham


Boston


Buffalo


Charlotte


Chicago


Cincinnati


Columbus


Dallas


Dayton


Denver


Greensboro/Winston-Salem


Honolulu


Houston


Jacksonville


Kansas City


Los Angeles


Louisville


Memphis


Miami/Fort Lauderdale


Milwaukee


Minneapolis/St. Paul


Nashville


New York


Orlando


Philadelphia


Phoenix


Pittsburgh


Portland


Raleigh/Durham


Sacramento


San Antonio


San Francisco


Seattle


Silicon Valley


St. Louis


Tampa Bay


Washington, D.C.


Wichita

















Limited Time Offer
Subscribe Now







 Search


× Close











Sign In


Sign In
Your Account 




Your Account


Welcome
Your Account 










Sign In
Existing Users




Create Your FREE Account
Don't have an account?




 






Your Account




Subscriptions




Newsletters


 

Custom Notifications




My Custom Site




Manage Site Users


 

Sign Out











Sign In


Sign In
Your Account 











 Search








 Home




Industries & Topics 




All Industries & Topics



Banking & Financial Services




Career & Workplace




Commercial Real Estate




Education




Energy




Food & Lifestyle




Government & Regulations




Health Care




Manufacturing




Media & Marketing




Philanthropy & Nonprofits




Professional Services




Residential Real Estate




Retailing




Sports Business




Technology




Transportation




Travel & Tourism




Sponsored Content



CRE Now




We Value Your Business




Office Environments




Small Business Marketing




Know Your Neighborhood










News 





News



Latest News




Business Pulse




Press Releases






 


Lists & Awards 





Lists



All Lists




Build Your Own Lists






 


People & Companies 





Companies



Top Private Companies




Find Businesses for Sale




Search for Company News





People



People on the Move




Contact Top Executives




Executive Profiles




Search for People in the News






 


Events 





Events



Business Event Calendar




Nominations






 


More… 






Jobs
Find or post a job




Store
Subscriptions, reprints & more









How To
Grow your business, advance your career




Thought Leadership
Trends, tips and insights from our partners





 


Subscribers 








Manage your Account






 


About & Contact 








About The Business Journals




Advertise




Help & FAQs




Call Center Directory






 


Apps & Syndication 








Newsletters






 


ACBJ Publications 








Bizwomen




Upstart




Hemmings




Sports Business Journal




Inside Lacrosse




BostInno




DCInno




ChicagoInno




AustinInno






 


Select a City 




National


Albany


Albuquerque


Atlanta


Austin


Baltimore


Birmingham


Boston


Buffalo


Charlotte


Chicago


Cincinnati


Columbus


Dallas


Dayton


Denver


Greensboro/Winston-Salem


Honolulu


Houston


Jacksonville


Kansas City


Los Angeles


Louisville


Memphis


Miami/Fort Lauderdale


Milwaukee


Minneapolis/St. Paul


Nashville


New York


Orlando


Philadelphia


Phoenix


Pittsburgh


Portland


Raleigh/Durham


Sacramento


San Antonio


San Francisco


Seattle


Silicon Valley


St. Louis


Tampa Bay


Washington, D.C.


Wichita







Follow us




 Twitter


 LinkedIn


 Facebook


 Google +













 






Press Releases



Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition






Jul 24, 2017, 4:05pm EDT














PHILADELPHIA, July 24, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. (the "Fund") (NYSE: JEQ), a closed-end equity fund, announced today its performance data and portfolio composition as of June 30, 2017.  



The Fund's total returns for various periods through June 30, 2017 are provided below. (All figures are based on distributions reinvested at the dividend reinvestment price and are stated net-of-fees):




Cumulative as of 06/30/17


Annualized as of 06/30/17




1 Month


3 Month


YTD


1 Year


3 Years


5 Years


10 Years


Since Inception



NAV 


0.2


5.9


12.9


11.4


9.2


13.0


2.4


2.1



Market Price


0.4


6.9


15.2


15.4


9.5


13.2


1.7


1.6



TOPIX


1.3


5.9


11.5


20.7


7.0


10.5


2.0


3.1

On June 30, 2017, the Fund's net assets amounted to US$127.6 million and the Fund's NAV per share was US$9.54.
As of June 30, 2017, the portfolio was invested as follows:



Portfolio Composition


Percent of Net Assets



Consumer Staples


20.1



Industrials


19.6



Consumer Discretionary


12.3



Information Technology


10.0



Health Care


9.8



Materials


9.4



Financials


8.4



Real Estate


5.6



Telecommunications


3.8



Cash


1.1

The Fund's ten largest equity holdings as of June 30, 2017, representing 41.6% of net assets, were: 



Stock 


Percent of
Net Assets



Shin-Etsu Chemical


5.7



Japan Tobacco


4.9



Keyence Corp.


4.8



Seven & I Holdings


4.3



Amada Holdings


3.9



KDDI Corp.


3.8



Nabtesco Corp.


3.7



Fanuc


3.7



Yahoo Japan


3.4



Pigeon Corp.


3.2

Important InformationAberdeen Asset Management Inc. has prepared this report based on information sources believed to be accurate and reliable. All reasonable care has been taken to ensure accuracy. However, the figures are unaudited and neither the Fund, Aberdeen Asset Management Asia Limited (the Investment Manager), nor any other person guarantees their accuracy. Investors should seek their own professional advice and should consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses before acting on this information. 
Aberdeen Asset Management Asia Limited (the "Investment Manager") and Aberdeen Asset Management Inc. (the "Administrator") are each a subsidiary of Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ("Aberdeen PLC").  On March 6, 2017, the Boards of Standard Life plc and Aberdeen PLC announced that they had reached an agreement on the terms of a merger ("Merger"). The Boards of each of Standard Life plc and Aberdeen PLC believe that the Merger has a compelling strategic and financial rationale through combining complementary strengths to create a world-class investment group. The Merger is expected to occur in the third quarter of 2017, subject to various conditions and terms, including regulatory approvals. The portfolio management team for the Fund is not expected to change as a result of the Merger.  In addition, the agreements that the Fund has with Aberdeen PLC's subsidiary companies, the services provided by such companies, and the fees charged for those services are not expected to change as a result of the Merger.
Closed-end funds are traded on the secondary market through one of the stock exchanges. The Fund's investment return and principal value will fluctuate so that an investor's shares may be worth more or less than the original cost. Shares of closed-end funds may trade above (a premium) or below (a discount) the net asset value (NAV) of the fund's portfolio. There is no assurance that the Fund will achieve its investment objective. 
Total return figures with distributions reinvested at the dividend reinvestment price are stated net-of-fees and represents past performance.  Past performance is not indicative of future results, current performance may be higher or lower.  Holdings are subject to change and are provided for informational purposes only and should not be deemed as a recommendation to buy or sell the securities shown.  Inception date July 24, 1992. 
If you wish to receive this information electronically, please contact: InvestorRelations@aberdeen-asset.com


View original content with multimedia:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/aberdeen-japan-equity-fund-inc-announces-performance-data-and-portfolio-composition-300492548.html
SOURCE  Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc.




The information on this page is provided by PR Newswire. All rights reserved. Reproduction or redistribution of this content without prior written consent from PR Newswire is strictly prohibited.  is not responsible for this content. Learn more about this service.








 





 





About PR Newswire







                                            The information on this page is provided by PR Newswire. The Business Journals is not responsible for this content.
                                        



Learn More







 









 
 


 


  



  JEQ Quote - Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc   JEQ:US   New York        8.58USD   0.01   0.12%     As of 8:04 PM EDT 7/24/2017     Open   8.56    Day Range   8.55 - 8.58    Previous Close   8.59    52Wk Range   7.29 - 8.70    1 Yr Return   15.15%    YTD Return   16.50%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   8.56    Day Range   8.55 - 8.58    Volume   2,960    Previous Close   8.59    52Wk Range   7.29 - 8.70    1 Yr Return   14.56%    YTD Return   16.50%    NAV (on 07/24/2017)   9.68000031    Total Assets (m USD) (on 02/28/2017)   119.500    Inception Date   07/24/1992    Premium/Discount   -11.36%    Average 52-Week Premium   -12.48%    Fund Managers   HUGH YOUNG / FLAVIA CHEONG    Last Dividend (on 12/28/2016)   0.089    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   1.04%    Expense Ratio   0.92%    3 Mo Return   5.41%    3 Yr Return   8.92%    5 Yr Return   14.51%                     Profile   Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. is a diversified, closed-end management company incorporated in the USA. The Fund's objective is to outperform over the long-term, on a total return basis, the Tokyo Stock Price Index. The Fund invests substantiallyall of its assets in equity securities of companies listed on the First or Second Section of the Tokyo Stock Exchange.    Address  Aberdeen Asset Management Inc.1735 Market Street32nd FloorPhiladelphia, PA 19103USA   Phone  1-800-522-5465   Website   www.aberdeen-asset.us              

JEQ Stock Price - Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











DJIA F

21,602


103


0.48%











S&P F

2,475.25


6.75


0.27%











NASDAQ F

5,939.25


5.25


0.09%











Gold

1,259.30


-1.40


-0.11%











Silver

16.395


-0.048


-0.29%











Crude Oil

47.19


0.85


1.83%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



XRX 
3.8




WYNN 
3.3




NRG 
3.2




INCY 
3.0






HAS
-9.4




FL
-4.6




HAL
-4.2




MAT
-3.8














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








8:35a

HCA Healthcare Q2 same-facility admissions up 0.8%



8:34a

HCA Healthcare affirms 2017 revenue outlook of $43.0 mln-$44.0 mln



8:34a

HCA Healthcare cuts 2017 EPS outlook to $7.00-$7.30 from $7.20-$7.60



8:33a

HCA Healthcare Q2 revenue $10.73 bln vs. $10.32 bln; FactSet consensus $10.76 bln



8:33a

Updated
Teaching people how to invest is one of the best marketing moves an adviser can make



8:33a

HCA Healthcare Q2 FactSet EPS consensus $1.80



8:32a

HCA Healthcare Q2 EPS $1.75 vs. $1.65 a year ago



8:31a

Caterpillar beats earnings views, lifts outlook



8:28a

Tintri started at overweight with $9 stock price target at KeyBanc Capital



8:27a

Neuralstem stock halted on news of mid-stage clinical trial miss












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


JEQ


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



JEQ
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateJEQAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 24, 2017 3:59 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
8.58



-0.01
-0.12%






Previous Close




$8.5900





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




23.81% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    3K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 12.4K
            





Open: 8.56
Close: 8.58



8.5500
Day Low/High
8.5800





Day Range



7.3100
52 Week Low/High
8.7000


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$8.56



Day Range
8.5500 - 8.5800



52 Week Range
7.3100 - 8.7000



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
13.6M



Public Float
n/a



Beta
0.64



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
1.04%



Dividend
$0.23



Ex-Dividend Date
Dec 28, 2016



Short Interest
1.22K
06/30/17


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
12.43K




 


Performance




5 Day


1.42%







1 Month


0.23%







3 Month


4.89%







YTD


16.50%







1 Year


9.44%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones










3 great ways to dress up your portfolio for year end

Dec. 9, 2013 at 12:02 p.m. ET
by Nigam Arora









Aging and ignored, Japan may be ready to rally


Jul. 3, 2012 at 12:01 a.m. ET
by Conrad de Aenlle









Avoid bonds and emerging markets, investor says


Feb. 7, 2011 at 12:01 a.m. ET
by Brett Arends









Dollar doom, but yen when?


Mar. 6, 2003 at 12:34 a.m. ET
by Peter Brimelow









Profiting from closed-end funds in volatile times


Feb. 21, 2003 at 10:26 a.m. ET
by Thomas J. Herzfeld













Bargain Hunters Snap up Japanese Shares


Mar. 15, 2011 at 2:26 p.m. ET
on SmartMoney









Country Funds' Slide
Extends Beyond Asia


Oct. 23, 1997 at 6:39 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Japanese yield curve threatens to do something it hasn't done in more than 25 years
Japanese yield curve threatens to do something it hasn't done in more than 25 years

Jul. 24, 2017 at 2:27 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





International Economic Week In Review: Positive News Continues
International Economic Week In Review: Positive News Continues

Jul. 24, 2017 at 3:08 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Don't Be Confused By The Facts Or Why Neither The Data Nor The Fed Will Alter Market Trends
Don't Be Confused By The Facts Or Why Neither The Data Nor The Fed Will Alter Market Trends

Jul. 23, 2017 at 10:59 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The Market Sentimentalist - Monetary Delusions
The Market Sentimentalist - Monetary Delusions

Jul. 21, 2017 at 6:09 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Nikkei 225: The Yen Is Falling - Big Deal
Nikkei 225: The Yen Is Falling - Big Deal

Jul. 21, 2017 at 12:41 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





BOJ struggling with inflation targets
BOJ struggling with inflation targets

Jul. 20, 2017 at 3:03 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The BOJ Bond Buying Binge
The BOJ Bond Buying Binge

Jul. 19, 2017 at 7:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Still Favoring Japan
Still Favoring Japan

Jul. 15, 2017 at 4:07 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Rising Japan Metabolism - Better Growth, Tokyo Backlash And Rising Geopolitical Tensions
Rising Japan Metabolism - Better Growth, Tokyo Backlash And Rising Geopolitical Tensions

Jul. 11, 2017 at 2:15 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Markets Looking For Next Cue
Markets Looking For Next Cue

Jul. 11, 2017 at 7:11 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





This Is What History Says About Asian Markets During The Second Half Of 2017
This Is What History Says About Asian Markets During The Second Half Of 2017

Jul. 7, 2017 at 9:07 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





BOJ steps up bond buying plans
BOJ steps up bond buying plans

Jul. 7, 2017 at 5:48 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Dollar Firm As Investors Await Fresh Directional Cues
Dollar Firm As Investors Await Fresh Directional Cues

Jul. 5, 2017 at 7:05 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Some Global Odds And Ends
Some Global Odds And Ends

Jul. 4, 2017 at 4:36 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Latest missile launch from N.Korea
Latest missile launch from N.Korea

Jul. 4, 2017 at 2:12 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Asian stocks start new month mixed
Asian stocks start new month mixed

Jul. 3, 2017 at 3:37 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Asian stocks start new month mixed
Asian stocks start new month mixed

Jul. 3, 2017 at 3:37 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





EU, Japan closer to trade deal
EU, Japan closer to trade deal

Jul. 2, 2017 at 10:27 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Tokyo Election Comes At A Rough Time For Abe
Tokyo Election Comes At A Rough Time For Abe

Jun. 29, 2017 at 11:45 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Sovereign Debt Jubilee, Japanese Style
Sovereign Debt Jubilee, Japanese Style

Jun. 28, 2017 at 3:31 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

Jul. 24, 2017 at 4:05 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

Jun. 22, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Results Of Annual Meeting Of Stockholders
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Results Of Annual Meeting Of Stockholders

Jun. 21, 2017 at 5:33 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

May. 22, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

Apr. 26, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Mar. 21, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Feb. 22, 2017 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Jan. 26, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Payment Of Distribution


Jan. 11, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Dec. 21, 2016 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Distribution


Dec. 21, 2016 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Azabu Value Partners Launch Japan Equity Fund


Dec. 20, 2016 at 3:29 a.m. ET
on PRWeb





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Nov. 21, 2016 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Oct. 21, 2016 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Sep. 22, 2016 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Aug. 19, 2016 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Jul. 25, 2016 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF








  



 
   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





AKS

-2.74%








GOOGL

0.45%








FIT

0.36%








CAT

1.49%








MCD

-1.34%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




8:38 AM EDT
July 25, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
8:36aHCA Healthcare Q2 same-facility admissions up 0.8%
8:35aHCA Healthcare affirms 2017 revenue outlook of $43.0 mln-$44.0 mln
8:35aHCA Healthcare cuts 2017 EPS outlook to $7.00-$7.30 from $7.20-$7.60
8:34aHCA Healthcare Q2 revenue $10.73 bln vs. $10.32 bln; FactSet consensus $10.76 bln
8:33aHCA Healthcare Q2 FactSet EPS consensus $1.80
8:33aTeaching people how to invest is one of the best marketing moves an adviser can make
8:32aHCA Healthcare Q2 EPS $1.75 vs. $1.65 a year ago
8:31aCaterpillar beats earnings views, lifts outlook
8:28aTintri started at overweight with $9 stock price target at KeyBanc Capital
8:28aNeuralstem stock halted on news of mid-stage clinical trial miss
8:27aTintri started at outperform with $9 stock price target at Raymond James
8:27aWebMD downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James
8:27aSpectranetics downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James
8:26aSierra Bancorp upgraded to outperform from market perform at Raymond James
8:26aAlphabet stock price target raised to $1,030 from $1,020 at Raymond James
8:24aMcDonald's expects to net restaurant additions of 400 in 2017
8:23aMcDonald's expects to have 2,500 'experience of the future' restaurants in U.S. by end of 2017
8:19aBREAKINGCaterpillar, McDonald's stocks set to add about 65 points to Dow industrials
8:19aSeagate Technology's stock plunges after profit and sales miss, CEO change
8:19aNeuralstem stock halted on news of mid-stage clinical trial miss
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,513.17

-66.90
-0.31%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,410.81

+23.05
+0.36%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,469.91

-2.63
-0.11%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




8:38 AM EDT
July 25, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
8:36aHCA Healthcare Q2 same-facility admissions up 0.8%
8:35aHCA Healthcare affirms 2017 revenue outlook of $43.0 mln-$44.0 mln
8:35aHCA Healthcare cuts 2017 EPS outlook to $7.00-$7.30 from $7.20-$7.60
8:34aHCA Healthcare Q2 revenue $10.73 bln vs. $10.32 bln; FactSet consensus $10.76 bln
8:33aHCA Healthcare Q2 FactSet EPS consensus $1.80
8:33aTeaching people how to invest is one of the best marketing moves an adviser can make
8:32aHCA Healthcare Q2 EPS $1.75 vs. $1.65 a year ago
8:31aCaterpillar beats earnings views, lifts outlook
8:28aTintri started at overweight with $9 stock price target at KeyBanc Capital
8:28aNeuralstem stock halted on news of mid-stage clinical trial miss
8:27aTintri started at outperform with $9 stock price target at Raymond James
8:27aWebMD downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James
8:27aSpectranetics downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James
8:26aSierra Bancorp upgraded to outperform from market perform at Raymond James
8:26aAlphabet stock price target raised to $1,030 from $1,020 at Raymond James
8:24aMcDonald's expects to net restaurant additions of 400 in 2017
8:23aMcDonald's expects to have 2,500 'experience of the future' restaurants in U.S. by end of 2017
8:19aBREAKINGCaterpillar, McDonald's stocks set to add about 65 points to Dow industrials
8:19aSeagate Technology's stock plunges after profit and sales miss, CEO change
8:19aNeuralstem stock halted on news of mid-stage clinical trial miss
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,513.17

-66.90
-0.31%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,410.81

+23.05
+0.36%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,469.91

-2.63
-0.11%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




8:38 AM EDT
July 25, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
8:36aHCA Healthcare Q2 same-facility admissions up 0.8%
8:35aHCA Healthcare affirms 2017 revenue outlook of $43.0 mln-$44.0 mln
8:35aHCA Healthcare cuts 2017 EPS outlook to $7.00-$7.30 from $7.20-$7.60
8:34aHCA Healthcare Q2 revenue $10.73 bln vs. $10.32 bln; FactSet consensus $10.76 bln
8:33aHCA Healthcare Q2 FactSet EPS consensus $1.80
8:33aTeaching people how to invest is one of the best marketing moves an adviser can make
8:32aHCA Healthcare Q2 EPS $1.75 vs. $1.65 a year ago
8:31aCaterpillar beats earnings views, lifts outlook
8:28aTintri started at overweight with $9 stock price target at KeyBanc Capital
8:28aNeuralstem stock halted on news of mid-stage clinical trial miss
8:27aTintri started at outperform with $9 stock price target at Raymond James
8:27aWebMD downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James
8:27aSpectranetics downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James
8:26aSierra Bancorp upgraded to outperform from market perform at Raymond James
8:26aAlphabet stock price target raised to $1,030 from $1,020 at Raymond James
8:24aMcDonald's expects to net restaurant additions of 400 in 2017
8:23aMcDonald's expects to have 2,500 'experience of the future' restaurants in U.S. by end of 2017
8:19aBREAKINGCaterpillar, McDonald's stocks set to add about 65 points to Dow industrials
8:19aSeagate Technology's stock plunges after profit and sales miss, CEO change
8:19aNeuralstem stock halted on news of mid-stage clinical trial miss
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,513.17

-66.90
-0.31%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,410.81

+23.05
+0.36%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,469.91

-2.63
-0.11%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































JEQ Stock Price - Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











DJIA F

21,601


102


0.47%











S&P F

2,475.00


6.50


0.26%











NASDAQ F

5,938.75


4.75


0.08%











Gold

1,259.20


-1.50


-0.12%











Silver

16.395


-0.048


-0.29%











Crude Oil

47.18


0.84


1.81%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



XRX 
3.8




WYNN 
3.3




NRG 
3.2




INCY 
3.0






HAS
-9.4




FL
-4.6




HAL
-4.2




MAT
-3.8














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








8:35a

HCA Healthcare Q2 same-facility admissions up 0.8%



8:34a

HCA Healthcare affirms 2017 revenue outlook of $43.0 mln-$44.0 mln



8:34a

HCA Healthcare cuts 2017 EPS outlook to $7.00-$7.30 from $7.20-$7.60



8:33a

HCA Healthcare Q2 revenue $10.73 bln vs. $10.32 bln; FactSet consensus $10.76 bln



8:33a

Updated
Teaching people how to invest is one of the best marketing moves an adviser can make



8:33a

HCA Healthcare Q2 FactSet EPS consensus $1.80



8:32a

HCA Healthcare Q2 EPS $1.75 vs. $1.65 a year ago



8:31a

Caterpillar beats earnings views, lifts outlook



8:28a

Tintri started at overweight with $9 stock price target at KeyBanc Capital



8:27a

Neuralstem stock halted on news of mid-stage clinical trial miss












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


JEQ


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



JEQ
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateJEQAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 24, 2017 3:59 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
8.58



-0.01
-0.12%






Previous Close




$8.5900





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




23.81% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    3K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 12.4K
            





Open: 8.56
Close: 8.58



8.5500
Day Low/High
8.5800





Day Range



7.3100
52 Week Low/High
8.7000


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$8.56



Day Range
8.5500 - 8.5800



52 Week Range
7.3100 - 8.7000



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
13.6M



Public Float
n/a



Beta
0.64



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
1.04%



Dividend
$0.23



Ex-Dividend Date
Dec 28, 2016



Short Interest
1.22K
06/30/17


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
12.43K




 


Performance




5 Day


1.42%







1 Month


0.23%







3 Month


4.89%







YTD


16.50%







1 Year


9.44%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones










3 great ways to dress up your portfolio for year end

Dec. 9, 2013 at 12:02 p.m. ET
by Nigam Arora









Aging and ignored, Japan may be ready to rally


Jul. 3, 2012 at 12:01 a.m. ET
by Conrad de Aenlle









Avoid bonds and emerging markets, investor says


Feb. 7, 2011 at 12:01 a.m. ET
by Brett Arends









Dollar doom, but yen when?


Mar. 6, 2003 at 12:34 a.m. ET
by Peter Brimelow









Profiting from closed-end funds in volatile times


Feb. 21, 2003 at 10:26 a.m. ET
by Thomas J. Herzfeld













Bargain Hunters Snap up Japanese Shares


Mar. 15, 2011 at 2:26 p.m. ET
on SmartMoney









Country Funds' Slide
Extends Beyond Asia


Oct. 23, 1997 at 6:39 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Japanese yield curve threatens to do something it hasn't done in more than 25 years
Japanese yield curve threatens to do something it hasn't done in more than 25 years

Jul. 24, 2017 at 2:27 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





International Economic Week In Review: Positive News Continues
International Economic Week In Review: Positive News Continues

Jul. 24, 2017 at 3:08 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Don't Be Confused By The Facts Or Why Neither The Data Nor The Fed Will Alter Market Trends
Don't Be Confused By The Facts Or Why Neither The Data Nor The Fed Will Alter Market Trends

Jul. 23, 2017 at 10:59 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The Market Sentimentalist - Monetary Delusions
The Market Sentimentalist - Monetary Delusions

Jul. 21, 2017 at 6:09 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Nikkei 225: The Yen Is Falling - Big Deal
Nikkei 225: The Yen Is Falling - Big Deal

Jul. 21, 2017 at 12:41 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





BOJ struggling with inflation targets
BOJ struggling with inflation targets

Jul. 20, 2017 at 3:03 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The BOJ Bond Buying Binge
The BOJ Bond Buying Binge

Jul. 19, 2017 at 7:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Still Favoring Japan
Still Favoring Japan

Jul. 15, 2017 at 4:07 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Rising Japan Metabolism - Better Growth, Tokyo Backlash And Rising Geopolitical Tensions
Rising Japan Metabolism - Better Growth, Tokyo Backlash And Rising Geopolitical Tensions

Jul. 11, 2017 at 2:15 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Markets Looking For Next Cue
Markets Looking For Next Cue

Jul. 11, 2017 at 7:11 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





This Is What History Says About Asian Markets During The Second Half Of 2017
This Is What History Says About Asian Markets During The Second Half Of 2017

Jul. 7, 2017 at 9:07 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





BOJ steps up bond buying plans
BOJ steps up bond buying plans

Jul. 7, 2017 at 5:48 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Dollar Firm As Investors Await Fresh Directional Cues
Dollar Firm As Investors Await Fresh Directional Cues

Jul. 5, 2017 at 7:05 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Some Global Odds And Ends
Some Global Odds And Ends

Jul. 4, 2017 at 4:36 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Latest missile launch from N.Korea
Latest missile launch from N.Korea

Jul. 4, 2017 at 2:12 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Asian stocks start new month mixed
Asian stocks start new month mixed

Jul. 3, 2017 at 3:37 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Asian stocks start new month mixed
Asian stocks start new month mixed

Jul. 3, 2017 at 3:37 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





EU, Japan closer to trade deal
EU, Japan closer to trade deal

Jul. 2, 2017 at 10:27 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Tokyo Election Comes At A Rough Time For Abe
Tokyo Election Comes At A Rough Time For Abe

Jun. 29, 2017 at 11:45 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Sovereign Debt Jubilee, Japanese Style
Sovereign Debt Jubilee, Japanese Style

Jun. 28, 2017 at 3:31 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

Jul. 24, 2017 at 4:05 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

Jun. 22, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Results Of Annual Meeting Of Stockholders
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Results Of Annual Meeting Of Stockholders

Jun. 21, 2017 at 5:33 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

May. 22, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition
Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition

Apr. 26, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Mar. 21, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Feb. 22, 2017 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Jan. 26, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Payment Of Distribution


Jan. 11, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Dec. 21, 2016 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Distribution


Dec. 21, 2016 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Azabu Value Partners Launch Japan Equity Fund


Dec. 20, 2016 at 3:29 a.m. ET
on PRWeb





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Nov. 21, 2016 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Oct. 21, 2016 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Sep. 22, 2016 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Aug. 19, 2016 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


Jul. 25, 2016 at 4:01 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF








  



 
   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





AKS

-2.74%








GOOGL

0.45%








FIT

0.36%








CAT

1.49%








MCD

-1.34%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.











  XJEQX Quote - Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc   XJEQX:US   NASDAQ GM        9.68USD   0.00   0.00%     As of 9:29 AM EDT 7/24/2017     Fund Type   Closed-End Fund    52Wk Range   8.37 - 9.76    1 Yr Return   12.06%    YTD Return   14.56%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Previous Close   9.68    52Wk Range   8.37 - 9.76    1 Yr Return   12.06%    YTD Return   14.56%    Fund Type   Closed-End Fund    Objective   Japan    Asset Class Focus   Equity    Geographic Focus   Japan    NAV (on 07/24/2017)   9.68    Total Assets (m USD) (on 02/28/2017)   119.500    Inception Date   07/24/1992    Last Dividend (on 12/28/2016)   0.089    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   0.92%    Fund Managers   HUGH YOUNG / FLAVIA CHEONG    Front Load Fee   0.00%    Back Load Fee   0.00%    Redemption Fee   0.00%    12b-1 Fee   0.00%    Current Mgmt Fee   0.60%    Expense Ratio   1.04%                     Profile   Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. is a diversified, closed-end management company incorporated in the USA. The Fund's objective is to outperform over the long-term, on a total return basis, the Tokyo Stock Price Index. The Fund invests substantiallyall of its assets in equity securities of companies listed on the First or Second Section of the Tokyo Stock Exchange.    Address  Aberdeen Asset Management Inc.1735 Market Street32nd FloorPhiladelphia, PA 19103USA   Phone  1-800-522-5465   Website   www.aberdeen-asset.us              


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Japan Fund (PRJPX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Japan Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				PRJPX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/24/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$13.69
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.03
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/24/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								19.25%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$11.37
							
							-
							
								$13.69
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$590.72

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall





3 Year





5 Year





10 Year







				Morningstar rated the Japan Fund among 
37,
37,
28
and 
12
Japan Stock
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			This fund's objective is long-term growth of capital through investment in the common stocks of companies located, or with primary operations, in Japan.
		
Average Annual Total Returns 2



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					19.83%
				
			

				
					19.83%
				
			


3 Years

				
					10.19%
				
			

				
					10.19%
				
			


5 Years

				
					13.00%
				
			

				
					13.00%
				
			


10 Years

				
					3.05%
				
			

				
					3.05%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 2.68%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							2.68%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							December 30, 1991
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						1.02%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						1.02%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   								
			


				The Japan Fund charges a 2% 
redemption fee on shares held 90 days or less. 
The performance information shown does not reflect the deduction of the redemption fee; 
if it did, the performance would be lower.
			


2
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Mon Jul 24 23:05:32 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















85% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 6/30/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Personal Finance





Summer 2017 Issue: T. Rowe Price Report

July 20, 2017









Personal Finance





Top 10 Financial To-Dos for Recent College Grads

July 19, 2017









Fixed Income





Finding Opportunities in High Yield Markets

July 18, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 6/30/17, 72 of 108 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*157 of our 332 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 134 of these 157 (85%) funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 215 of 317 (68%), 183 of 225 (81%), 149 of 180 (83%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
36 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 6/30/17 (includes all share classes). 34 of these 36 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 38 of 39, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 6/30/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 162 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 6/30/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now



































2017 Investment Outlook




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in










Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          

















2017 Investment Outlook


































The Long Cycle Continues





We expect the long post-crisis economic recovery to continue in 2017. As a base case, we think growth is poised to broaden out to more countries, with the global economy drawing on more sources of strength than at any point since 2010.
From an investment perspective, our base case view is broadly supportive for risk assets. We prefer equities over credit and credit over rates, but we expect low returns from these traditional exposures given 1) elevated valuations, 2) limited upside for corporate earnings from current levels and 3) limits to economic growth potential. Broadening exposure beyond conventional stocks and bonds, identifying opportunities in emerging markets and deploying more dynamic asset allocation strategies are some ways to adapt.
In some respects, our outlook represents an extension of the same long cycle we envisioned heading into 2016. The key difference for 2017 revolves around four emerging transitions. Populism is challenging globalism and creating new tail risks. Concerns about low growth are giving way to concerns about inflation. Years of focus on monetary policy are giving way to a close watch over fiscal policy. And concerns about new regulation are acceding to hopes for de-regulation.
Transition will be an evolving theme in 2017, and we will be re-visiting it in our publications throughout the year. In this Investment Outlook, we highlight specific signposts we will be watching, both to gauge the pace of transition and to test our base case view on the key investment questions.









Three Key Questions







Is it time to de-risk?
Is it time to de-risk?
No. We think de-risking would be premature, at
least from a purely return-generating standpoint. We
expect the macro environment to remain supportive
of risk assets during 2017 amid a slow-but-steady
expansion in developed markets and an acceleration
of growth in some emerging markets.

VIEW MORE



What’s driving the expansion?
What’s driving the expansion?
We believe this is a slow-growth recovery best
explained by cyclical economic drivers. We believe
the concerns about the developed world being mired
in a pattern of underinvestment and stalled growth—
so-called secular stagnation—are overdone.

VIEW MORE



Where do we see opportunities?
Where do we see opportunities?
In a low-return world, we look for sources of
return beyond conventional stock and bond market
approaches. We also think range-bound or volatile
markets create opportunities for more dynamic
investment strategies.

VIEW MORE






 
 






Transitions We’re Watching in 2017


















												Globalism to Populism
											



The biggest transition in the current environment is a shift away from globalism to a rising populist trend.















												Stagnation to Inflation
											



We expect concerns around potential secular stagnation to give way to a more inflationary paradigm in the US.















												Monetary to Fiscal Policy
											



The focus for stimulus is shifting toward fiscal spending, as central banks are stretching toward the limits of their easing ability.
















												Regulation to De-Regulation
											



We see the potential for greater regulatory divergence globally and the potential for competitive de-regulation.









2017 GDP Forecasts by Country, Region and Market (%)
We expect the prolonged expansion phase of the growth cycle to continue in 2017
 










Source: GSAM. As of January 2017.






Our 12-Month Cross-Asset Views Compared to 2016
We favor equities and emerging market assets over corporate credit and government bonds
 










Source: GSAM Global Portfolio Solutions (GPS) as of December 2016 and are subject to change. Chart reflects GPS relative asset allocation views and may not be representative of each GSAM portfolio team’s view on opportunities within individual markets.






Related Items











2017 INVESTMENT OUTLOOK
Download the full publication

 
													DOWNLOAD
												





2017 INVESTMENT OUTLOOK CHARTBOOK
Download the chartbook

 
													DOWNLOAD
												















                        
                        
                            Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Featured Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Perspectives
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               




SOLUTIONS FOR






                        
                        
                            About GSAM
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Overview
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News and Media
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Careers
		           		 
					     
						    



















































Fund Finder




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in






(0)









Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          








											Mutual Funds
										



















  
  
  










0 Funds found





Filters








Quick sets















ASSET CLASS








Equity








Back








All Equity






Domestic Large





Domestic Small/Medium





Domestic All Cap





International Large





International Small/Medium





International All Cap








Fixed Income








Back








All Fixed Income






Short Duration/Government






Single Sector






Municipal/Tax-Free






Multi-Sector









Alternatives






Commodities






Real Estate / Infrastructure






Portfolio Solutions








Back








All Portfolio Solutions






Target Date









Money Markets








Back








All Money Markets






Taxable






Tax Free











SHARE CLASS








For all asset classes








Back









A





C





Institutional





Institutional Retirement





Retirement





Service







Admin





Separate Account





R6





Advisor





Preferred








For money market funds








Back









Institutional





Select





Preferred





Capital





Admin





Premier







Service





Resource





CMS





C





A





R6










MORNINGSTAR RATINGS










4 & 5 Stars






3, 4 & 5 Stars






All Rated








Morningstar Categories








Back








Morningstar Categories







Allocation--30pct to 50pct Equity





Allocation--85pct+ Equity





Bank Loan





Commodities Broad Basket





Corporate Bond





Diversified Emerging Mkts





Emerging Markets Bond





Emerging-Markets Local-Currency Bond





Energy Limited Partnership





Foreign Large Blend





Foreign Large Growth





Foreign Large Value





Foreign Small/Mid Value





Global Real Estate







High Yield Bond





High Yield Muni





Inflation-Protected Bond





Infrastructure





Intermediate Government





Intermediate-Term Bond





Large Blend





Large Growth





Large Value





Long-Short Credit





Long-Short Equity





Managed Futures





Mid-Cap Blend





Mid-Cap Growth







Mid-Cap Value





Multialternative





Muni National Interm





Muni National Short





Nontraditional Bond





Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stk





Real Estate





Short Government





Short-Term Bond





Small Blend





Small Growth





Small Value





Tactical Allocation





Target-Date 2020







Target-Date 2025





Target-Date 2030





Target-Date 2035





Target-Date 2040





Target-Date 2045





Target-Date 2050





Target-Date 2055





Technology





Ultrashort Bond





World Allocation





World Bond





World Large Stock











LIPPER RANKING










Top 25%






Top 50%






All Lipper








Lipper Categories








Back








Equity Categories











Emerging Markets Funds





Equity Income Funds





Global Multi-Cap Core





International Equity Income Funds





International Multi-Cap Core





International Small/Mid-Cap Core





Large-Cap Core Funds





Large-Cap Growth Funds





Large-Cap Value Funds





Mid-Cap Core Funds







Mid-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Core Funds





Multi-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Value Funds





Pacific Ex Japan Funds





Science & Technology Funds





Small-Cap Core Funds





Small-Cap Growth Funds





Small-Cap Value Funds










Fixed Income Categories











Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Core Bond Funds





Core Plus Bond Funds





Corporate Debt Funds BBB-Rated





Emerging Markets Local Currency Debt Fds





Emerging Mrkts Hard Currency Debt Funds





General U.S. Government Funds





Global Income Funds





High Yield Funds





High Yield Municipal Debt Funds







Inflation Protected Bond Funds





Intermediate Municipal Debt Funds





Intermediate U.S. Government Funds





Loan Participation Funds





Short Municipal Debt Funds





Short U.S. Government Funds





Short-Intmdt Investment Grade Debt Funds





U.S. Mortgage Funds





Ultra-Short Obligations Funds










Alternatives Categories











Absolute Return Funds





Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Alternative Long/Short Equity Funds







Alternative Managed Futures Funds





Alternative Multi-Strategy Funds





Flexible Portfolio Funds










Commodities Categories











Commodities General Funds


















Real Estate / Infrastructure











Energy MLP Funds





Global Infrastructure Funds





Global Real Estate Funds







International Real Estate Funds





Real Estate Funds










Portfolio Solutions Categories











Flexible Portfolio Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2020 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2025 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2030 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2035 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2040 Funds







Mixed-Asset Target 2045 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2050 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2055+ Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Agg Gro Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Growth Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Moderate Funds










Daily Liquid Alternatives Categories











Alternative Other Funds


























Quick sets








Featured Funds






Star Performers






Recently Viewed Funds













Reset




Save




DEFAULT SELECTIONS








Loading Fund Finder data...


No results match your criteria. Try broadening your search. Reset filters. Or go back to previous results.


Error loading page.  Please accept our apologies.




Performance
Prices
Characteristics
Fund Facts










New fund































                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Advisor Resources
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Defined Contribution Investment Only
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Regulatory Documents
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               



















































Fund Finder




















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








						 Account Access








Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          








											Mutual Funds
										



















  
  
  










0 Funds found





Filters








Quick sets















ASSET CLASS








Equity








Back








All Equity






Domestic Large





Domestic Small/Medium





Domestic All Cap





International Large





International Small/Medium





International All Cap








Fixed Income








Back








All Fixed Income






Short Duration/Government






Single Sector






Municipal/Tax-Free






Multi-Sector









Alternatives






Commodities






Real Estate / Infrastructure






Portfolio Solutions








Back








All Portfolio Solutions






Target Date









Money Markets








Back








All Money Markets






Taxable






Tax Free











SHARE CLASS








For all asset classes








Back









A





C





Institutional





Institutional Retirement





Retirement





Service







Admin





Separate Account





R6





Advisor





Preferred








For money market funds








Back









Institutional





Select





Preferred





Capital





Admin





Premier







Service





Resource





CMS





C





A





R6










MORNINGSTAR RATINGS










4 & 5 Stars






3, 4 & 5 Stars






All Rated








Morningstar Categories








Back








Morningstar Categories







Allocation--30pct to 50pct Equity





Allocation--85pct+ Equity





Bank Loan





Commodities Broad Basket





Corporate Bond





Diversified Emerging Mkts





Emerging Markets Bond





Emerging-Markets Local-Currency Bond





Energy Limited Partnership





Foreign Large Blend





Foreign Large Growth





Foreign Large Value





Foreign Small/Mid Value





Global Real Estate







High Yield Bond





High Yield Muni





Inflation-Protected Bond





Infrastructure





Intermediate Government





Intermediate-Term Bond





Large Blend





Large Growth





Large Value





Long-Short Credit





Long-Short Equity





Managed Futures





Mid-Cap Blend





Mid-Cap Growth







Mid-Cap Value





Multialternative





Muni National Interm





Muni National Short





Nontraditional Bond





Pacific/Asia ex-Japan Stk





Real Estate





Short Government





Short-Term Bond





Small Blend





Small Growth





Small Value





Tactical Allocation





Target-Date 2020







Target-Date 2025





Target-Date 2030





Target-Date 2035





Target-Date 2040





Target-Date 2045





Target-Date 2050





Target-Date 2055





Technology





Ultrashort Bond





World Allocation





World Bond





World Large Stock











LIPPER RANKING










Top 25%






Top 50%






All Lipper








Lipper Categories








Back








Equity Categories











Emerging Markets Funds





Equity Income Funds





Global Multi-Cap Core





International Equity Income Funds





International Multi-Cap Core





International Small/Mid-Cap Core





Large-Cap Core Funds





Large-Cap Growth Funds





Large-Cap Value Funds





Mid-Cap Core Funds







Mid-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Core Funds





Multi-Cap Growth Funds





Multi-Cap Value Funds





Pacific Ex Japan Funds





Science & Technology Funds





Small-Cap Core Funds





Small-Cap Growth Funds





Small-Cap Value Funds










Fixed Income Categories











Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Core Bond Funds





Core Plus Bond Funds





Corporate Debt Funds BBB-Rated





Emerging Markets Local Currency Debt Fds





Emerging Mrkts Hard Currency Debt Funds





General U.S. Government Funds





Global Income Funds





High Yield Funds





High Yield Municipal Debt Funds







Inflation Protected Bond Funds





Intermediate Municipal Debt Funds





Intermediate U.S. Government Funds





Loan Participation Funds





Short Municipal Debt Funds





Short U.S. Government Funds





Short-Intmdt Investment Grade Debt Funds





U.S. Mortgage Funds





Ultra-Short Obligations Funds










Alternatives Categories











Absolute Return Funds





Alternative Credit Focus Funds





Alternative Long/Short Equity Funds







Alternative Managed Futures Funds





Alternative Multi-Strategy Funds





Flexible Portfolio Funds










Commodities Categories











Commodities General Funds


















Real Estate / Infrastructure











Energy MLP Funds





Global Infrastructure Funds





Global Real Estate Funds







International Real Estate Funds





Real Estate Funds










Portfolio Solutions Categories











Flexible Portfolio Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2020 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2025 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2030 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2035 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2040 Funds







Mixed-Asset Target 2045 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2050 Funds





Mixed-Asset Target 2055+ Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Agg Gro Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Growth Funds





Mixed-Asset Target Alloc Moderate Funds










Daily Liquid Alternatives Categories











Alternative Other Funds


























Quick sets








Featured Funds






Star Performers






Recently Viewed Funds













Reset




Save




DEFAULT SELECTIONS








Loading Fund Finder data...


No results match your criteria. Try broadening your search. Reset filters. Or go back to previous results.


Error loading page.  Please accept our apologies.




Performance
Prices
Characteristics
Fund Facts










New fund































                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Products
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Prospectuses
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               



















































Goldman Sachs Active Beta ETFs



















































Please choose a role




Select your country:

Internal View








Log in






(0)









Our services in the selected country:
No services available for your region.






Select Country:





Select Country








 Remember my selection

View Global Site








Your browser is out of date. It has known security flaws and may not display all features of this and other websites  









          

















 

 


Goldman Sachs ETFs



































ACTIVEBETA®
1 of 4





ACCESS BONDS
2 of 4





HEDGE INDUSTRY
3 of 4





TREASURY ACCESS
4 of 4













Next Generation of ETF Investing

                Over the last two decades, investors have increasingly turned to Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs) seeking to benefit from a defined strategy, diversified exposure to stocks, tax efficiency and low costs. Today, we combine the potential benefits of ETFs with the advanced strategies of Goldman Sachs Asset Managment (GSAM).
            









What Are the Potential Benefits of ETFs?





ETFs have grown in popularity due to the many benefits they offer: intraday trading ease, relative transparency and a likelihood of tax efficiency—all typically at lower total cost than most actively managed mutual funds.
 











The Four Ts









 
Source: GSAM. For illustrative purposes only.
We note that ETFs are not riskless investments, so investors can lose money. Please see the ETF Risk Disclosures for additional risk considerations in the end disclosures. Ordinary brokerage commissions apply. Brokerage commissions will reduce returns.
Goldman Sachs does not provide legal, tax or accounting advice to its clients. All investors are strongly urged to consult with their legal, tax, or accounting advisors regarding any potential transactions or investments. There is no assurance that the tax status or treatment of a proposed transaction or investment will continue in the future. Tax treatment or status may be changed by law or government action in the future or on a retroactive basis.










Exponential Growth of the ETF Market





Developed in the early 1990s with lower cost, transparency and tax efficiency in mind, today there are ETFs representing both broad and narrow sectors of the market, and hundreds of ways to diversify. With $2 trillion in investor assets, it’s safe to say that ETFs are here to stay.
 







 








Growth of ETFs










 







EXPLORE ETF PRODUCTS 






Next Generation of Equity Index Investing

                GSAM has developed a series of ETFs built on smart beta1 principles—a transparent, rules-based strategy that goes beyond stocks’ market capitalization, resulting in a more economically intuitive way to invest.
            

















 

$ {headerPrefix } 







Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta™ ETFs















Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta™ ETFs

 / 






















Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta™ ETFs





These ETFs are designed to track an ActiveBeta® Index, a proprietary performance-seeking methodology from Goldman Sachs, which tilts towards stocks based on four well-established drivers of performance, often referred to as factors.








The Four Factors














The Advantages of Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta™ Investing









Opportunity to Outperform the Market




To construct the ActiveBeta® Index, GSAM employs a simple, transparent process that helps identify and emphasize stocks within the market-cap weighted universe, potentially providing greater returns.
 









A Diversified Approach




Individual factors can be cyclical in the short run, which may lead to timing and performance challenges. Combining four complementary smart beta factors equally can potentially result in a more consistent investment experience over time.
 









Lower Cost




Not only are ActiveBeta™ ETFs a fraction of the price of most smart beta ETFs, they are also among the most competitively priced products on the market.2











Source: Morningstar and GSAM as of May 16, 2016. For illustrative purposes only.
There is no guarantee that these objectives will be met. ActiveBeta® is a trademark of Goldman Sachs. 9.0 bps (after expense limitation) for ActiveBeta® U.S. Large Cap Equity ETF refers to the Goldman Sachs ActiveBeta® U.S. Large Cap Equity ETF. 9.5 bps for largest ETF by Assets under Management (AUM) refers to the SPDR S&P 500 ETF Trust (SPY). ALPS Distributors, Inc. is the distributor for the SPDR S&P 500 ETF Trust (SPY). 35.3 bps refers to the average fund fee for Strategic Beta ETFs in the Morningstar US ETF Large Blend Category and 32.2 bps refers to the average fund fee of index ETFs in the Morningstar US ETF Large Blend Category.








ActiveBeta™ ETFs Brochure
Download the brochure

 
													DOWNLOAD
												










Next Generation Fixed Income Investing

                GSAM now offers the next generation, smart beta Access ETFs that seek better risk-adjusted returns to help meet the needs of today’s fixed income investor.
            









Access ETFs by Goldman Sachs





GSAM’s Access ETFs can help investors build efficient fixed income portfolios. Going a step further than traditional market-value weighted methodology, a smart beta approach selects bonds based on liquidity and customized fundamentals.














The Advantages of Goldman Sachs Fixed Income Investing









Smarter Access to Bond Markets




The index employs a simple, transparent process that helps identify an investible universe, then eliminates issuers with relative deteriorating fundamentals to offer exposure to existing sector or market beta.
 









Seeks Smoother Performance, Less Volatility




As bond investors look for income and diversification, a smart beta approach seeks liquidity while minimizing exposure to factors historically associated with volatility and underperformance.
 









Lower Cost




Access ETFs are among the most competitively priced ETFs on the market. They also offer transparency and can alleviate some of the challenges of buying bonds in the over-the-counter market.3










Source: GSAM and Morningstar. Data as of March 31, 2017. For illustrative purposes only. The GS Access Investment Grade Corporate Bond ETF expense ratio is 14 basis points (bp). Please see the end notes for expense ratio and other important disclosures. Category expense ratios represent category averages for all funds in the corporate bond category as defined by Morningstar. The average net expense ratio for ETFs in the category is 19 bps and for active and passive mutual funds combined, I-Shares only, it is 57 bps.








Access ETFs Brochure
Download the brochure

 
													DOWNLOAD
												









Access to Top Insights

                GSAM developed the Goldman Sachs Hedge Fund VIP Index, which tracks insights from some of the leading thinkers in the hedge fund universe. The Goldman Sachs Hedge Industry VIP ETF seeks to track this index and provides exposure to hedge fund managers’ most important long equity ideas.
            









Introducing the Goldman Sachs Hedge Industry VIP ETF (Ticker: GVIP)





The fund seeks to track the Goldman Sachs Hedge Fund VIP Index, which is constructed in accordance with a rules-based methodology derived from concepts previously developed by Goldman Sachs’ Global Investment Research division. The Index is designed to measure the performance of fundamentally-driven hedge fund managers' “Very-Important-Positions” — those positions that appear most frequently among their top 10 long equity holdings. The Goldman Sachs Hedge Industry VIP ETF (Ticker: GVIP) seeks to deliver these high-conviction ideas through the ease, transparency and liquidity of an ETF.









The Advantages of Investing in GVIP














The Fund is not a hedge fund and does not invest in hedge funds.
1. ETFs offer many benefits, including intraday trading, relative transparency and tax efficiency potential, all at typically lower expense ratios than most actively-managed mutual funds.








Hedge Industry VIP ETF Brochure
Download the brochure

 
													DOWNLOAD
												









Access to the Treasury Market

                GSAM developed an ETF that provides access to Treasuries with a maturity of less than a year, which are backed by the full faith and credit of the US Government. Investors in the Goldman Sachs TreasuryAccess 0-1 Year ETF can gain easy access to Treasury markets while avoiding the operational and pricing complexities of US Treasury Auctions and over-the-counter market.
            









Introducing the Goldman Sachs TreasuryAccess 0-1 Year ETF (Ticker: GBIL)





The fund seeks to track the Citi US Treasury 0–1 Year Composite Select Index, which is designed to measure the performance of U.S. Treasury Obligations4 with a maximum remaining maturity of one year. The Goldman Sachs TreasuryAccess 0–1 Year ETF (Ticker: GBIL) provides access to the Treasury market through a lower cost, convenient and transparent ETF. The fund benefits from the experience of the GSAM Liquidity Solutions team, providing trade execution, price negotiation and security selection in the short-term Treasury market.









The Advantages of Investing in GBIL










Any guarantee on U.S Treasury Obligations applies only to the underlying securities of the Fund if held to maturity and not to the value of the Fund’s shares.
Individual shares may only be purchased and sold in secondary market transactions through brokers; shares trade at market prices rather than NAV; shares may trade at a price greater than or less than NAV; and investors may incur commission costs when buying or selling shares.
The Fund is not a money market fund and does not attempt to maintain a stable net asset value.








TreasuryAccess ETF Brochure
Download the brochure

 
													DOWNLOAD
												









Goldman Sachs Exchange-Traded Funds

	       At Goldman Sachs Asset Management, we have a history of investment innovation—grounded in our commitment to provide clients with solutions that keep up with changing times. Our skilled investment teams manage a variety of advanced strategies** that capitalize on our global reach and deep knowledge of the markets. By offering these advanced strategies as Goldman Sachs ETFs, we continue this legacy and lead the way for the next generation of ETF investing.
	    

EXPLORE ETF PRODUCTS 












                        
                        
                            Market Insights
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Market Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Asset Class Views
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Insights
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        GSAM Connect
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Goldman Sachs Global Investment Research
		           		 
					     
						    







                        
                        
                            Products
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        All Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Mutual Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Exchange-Traded Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Closed-End Funds
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Variable Insurance Trusts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Separately Managed Accounts
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Liquidity Solutions
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Resources
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Advisor Resources
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Investment Ideas
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Portfolio Strategy
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Defined Contribution Investment Only
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Client Service
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Literature
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Literature Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Tax Center
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Forms and Applications
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Regulatory Documents
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Fact Cards
		           		 
					     
               






                        
                        
                            Our Firm
                        
                    



 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        About GSAM
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Citizenship
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Recognition
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        News
		           		 
					     
               


 
                    
		                 
	                     
	                        Contact Us
		           		 
					     
               






















































aberdeen japan equity fund - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund - LookSmart | www1.looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund



Results for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund. Get the look smart on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





Fund Equity - Search for Fund Equity.



Ad
 ·
excite.com/​Fund Equity



Search for Fund Equity. Find Fund Equity.




Equity Fund - Find It Here | search.com



Ad
 ·
www.search.com/​Equity Fund/​Now



Find Equity Fund Here & Check Out 1000+ Results Now





All That You Need



Straight Accounting



Your Finances Up To Date



Difficult Finances





Equity Fund - Find Equity Fund.



Ad
 ·
FindArticles.com/​Equity Fund



Find Equity Fund. News & Shopping Results at Once!




Searches related toaberdeen japan equity fund



aberdeen us equity fund


jeq



japan closed end funds


aberdeen global




Web Results

Japan Equity Fund, Inc. | Aberdeen US

www.aberdeenjeq.com


$$US Investment Trusts|Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc.|InvestmentObjective$$ Investment Policies The Fund seeks to achieve its investment objective by investing ...


Aberdeen Japan Equity | Aberdeen Fund Managers Limited ...

https://www.trustnet.com/Factsheets/Factsheet.aspx?fundCode=MJJG


Aberdeen Japan Equity from Aberdeen Fund Managers Limited prices, cumulative, discrete & annual performances. Investment objectives, asset allocation, top ten ...


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc - Bloomberg.com

https://www.bloomberg.com/quote/JEQ:US


Performance charts for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc (JEQ) including intraday, historical and comparison charts, technical analysis and trend lines.


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance ...

www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/aberdeen-japan-equity-fund-inc...


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance Data And Portfolio Composition


JEQ Stock Price - Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. Stock ...

www.marketwatch.com/investing/stock/JEQ


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. stock price, stock quotes and financial overviews from MarketWatch.


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund A|GB0004521620

www.morningstar.co.uk/uk/funds/snapshot/snapshot.aspx?id=F0GBR04DTK


Fund price for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund A along with Morningstar ratings & research, long term fund performance and charts


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund - Aberdeen Asset Management

www.aberdeen-asia.com/.../funds-and-prices/aberdeen-japan-equity-fund


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Investment Objective. The Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund aims to provide Holders with medium to long-term capital growth from a portfolio of ...


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Performance ...

https://finance.yahoo.com/news/aberdeen-japan-equity-fund-inc...


PHILADELPHIA , July 24, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. (the "Fund") (NYSE: JEQ) , a closed-end equity fund, announced today its performance ...


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Results Of ...

https://ih.advfn.com/p.php?pid=nmona&article=75087792


JEQ Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. Announces Results Of Annual Meeting Of Stockholders


JEQ : Summary for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc - Yahoo

https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/JEQ


View the basic JEQ stock chart on Yahoo Finance. Change the date range, chart type and compare Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc against other companies.










Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund - LookSmart | www1.looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund



Results for Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund. Get the look smart on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





Fund Equity - Search for Fund Equity.



Ad
 ·
excite.com/​Fund Equity



Search for Fund Equity. Find Fund Equity.




Equity Fund - Find It Here | search.com



Ad
 ·
www.search.com/​Equity Fund/​Now



Find Equity Fund Here & Check Out 1000+ Results Now





All That You Need



Straight Accounting



Your Finances Up To Date



Difficult Finances





Equity Fund - Find Equity Fund.



Ad
 ·
FindArticles.com/​Equity Fund



Find Equity Fund. News & Shopping Results at Once!



Searches related toaberdeen japan equity fund



aberdeen us equity fund


jeq



japan closed end funds


aberdeen global




12345Next






Answers







Companies listed on the New York Stock...



US Abercrombie & Fitch US Aberdeen Greater China Fund, Inc. US Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund, Inc. US Aberdeen Singapore Fund,

more






Equity Funding



Equity Funding Corporation of America was a Los Angeles-based U.S. financial conglomerate that marketed a package of mutual funds and life insurance to...

more






Private equity fund



A private equity fund is a collective investment scheme used for making investments in various equity (and to a lesser extent debt) securities...

more




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network








